Prevalence of Mycoplasma pneumoniae-associated respiratory tract infections in hospitalized children: results of a 4-year prospective study in Tunis.Specific microbiologic, molecular, and serologic assays are hardly available in Tunis to confirm a suspected infection of Mycoplasma pneumoniae (MP). These diagnosis methods were used for the first time in a Tunisian prospective study to estimate the prevalence of MP infection in children and to evaluate their usefulness for diagnosis. A total of 540 children hospitalized in Tunis for lower respiratory tract infections (LRTIs) between 2005 and 2009 and 580 clinical specimens were investigated for the presence of MP by culture and by end-point polymerase chain reaction (PCR) targeting the P1 and the 16S rRNA genes. Real-time PCR was also used for MP detection on 158 respiratory samples. A total of 525 serum samples were tested for detection of MP-specific IgM and IgG. The P1 adhesin type and the antibiotic susceptibility testing were determined for the 9 clinical strains isolated during the study period. MP was detected in 33 (5.7%) clinical samples. Specific MP seropositivity was confirmed in 54 serum samples (10.3%), among which 19 (3.6%) were indicative of acute MP infection. MP infection was confirmed in 39 (7.2%) patients: 24 positive by PCR and/or culture, 10 serologically positive only, and 5 confirmed positive by both methods. MP infections occurred throughout the year with a slight decrease in autumn. The 9 MP isolates were susceptible to erythromycin, tetracycline, and ciprofloxacin, and all belonged to type I. The prevalence of MP infection in children with LRTI was 7.2% between 2005 and 2009, in Tunisia. Combination of direct detection and serology was required to enhance the clinical sensitivity of MP detection in clinical specimens.Detection of Mycoplasma pneumoniae in children with lower respiratory tract infections.Mycoplasma pneumoniae is known to be a major cause of lower respiratory tract infections (LRTIs) in children. We studied 75 children who had been hospitalized for community-acquired LRTIs for the detection of M. pneumoniae by serological analysis and polymerase chain reaction (PCR) to amplify a 277-base pair region of 16S rDNA gene of M. pneumoniae applied to throat swab specimens. Serological and/or PCR positive results diagnosed M. pneumoniae infection in 23 (30.7%) patients.Isolation of Mycoplasma pneumoniae from children with lower-respiratory-tract infections.The prevalence and clinical pictures of Mycoplasma pneumoniae infections among children were studied using culture and serological techniques. The isolation rate was 22% (195 of 885) in pneumonic patients and 11% (66 of 600) in non-pneumonic patients. In patients three years of age or less, M. pneumoniae was isolated at the same rate from febrile and afebrile cases and from wheezy and non-wheezy cases. In older patients, however, M. pneumoniae was frequently isolated from febrile but non-wheezy cases. A peak in the number of the positive isolates was found in patients who were four years old. The peak number of M. pneumoniae infections at age four was confirmed serologically. This peak was in patients who were younger than those previously reported.Clinical, radiographic and hematological characteristics of Mycoplasma pneumoniae pneumonia.To describe the clinical, hematological and radiographic characteristics of children hospitalized for Mycoplasma pneumoniae pneumonia.The study population consisted of 190 children between 3 months and 16 years old, hospitalized for radiographically confirmed pneumonia. Patients were divided into two groups, to wit: 95 children with Mycoplasma pneumoniae pneumonia, as diagnosed using the enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) method; and 95 children with pneumonia caused by other etiologic agents. Using a validated scoring system, the clinical, hematological and radiographic findings of both groups were compared to differentiate Mycoplasma pneumoniae pneumonia (group 1) from pneumonia caused by other etiologic agents (group 2), itself divided into two groups, bacterial (n = 75) and viral (n = 20).Mycoplasma pneumoniae pneumonia was found most often in girls (p < 0.01), older children (p < 0.01), and patients with dry cough (p < 0.01) and extrapulmonary manifestations (p < 0.01). The clinical, hematological and radiographic variables of Mycoplasma pneumoniae pneumonia (mean score = 6.95) scored between those found in bacterial (mean score = 8.27) and viral pneumonia (mean score = 0.90).Results suggest that the scoring system can contribute to the presumptive diagnosis of Mycoplasma pneumoniae pneumonia and help differentiate pneumonic status caused by other etiologic agents.[Epidemiology and morbidity of mycoplasma as causative agent for community-acquired pneumonia in hospitalized children in a Community Hospital in Vienna].Epidemiology and morbidity of mycoplasma-associated pneumonia in youths and children in Vienna are not known. The first objective was to elucidate the incidence and the second was to evaluate a standard antibiotic regimen with addition of a macrolid in children over 5 years.Hospitalized patients were evaluated prospectively during 3 winter seasons. In a clinical routine setting microbiologic tests were performed, nasal secretions were tested for viruses, Chlamydia pneumoniae and Mycoplasma pneumoniae, and clinical parameters were documented.Mycoplasma pneumoniae was identified in 12 patients out of 279 (4.3%). All were 5 years and older. The mean number of days in hospital was 4.6, the number of days with fever > 38.5 degrees was 1.2, the maximal value of C-reactive protein was 48 mg/L, no complications occurred, and all children recovered completely.Mycoplasma pneumoniae was identified in 4.3% of children and youths. The antibiotic regimen is appropriate as initial therapy.Role of Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydia pneumoniae in children with community-acquired lower respiratory tract infections.In order to evaluate the role of Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydia pneumoniae, we studied 613 children aged 2-14 years who were hospitalized for community-acquired lower respiratory tract infections (LRTIs). The patients were enrolled in the study by 21 centers in different regions of Italy from May 1998 through April 1999. Paired serum samples were obtained on admission and after 4-6 weeks to assay the titers of M. pneumoniae and C. pneumoniae antibodies. Nasopharyngeal aspirates for the detection of M. pneumoniae and C. pneumoniae were obtained on admission. Acute M. pneumoniae infections in 210 patients (34.3%) and acute C. pneumoniae infections in 87 (14.1%) were diagnosed. Fifteen of the 18 children with M. pneumoniae and/or C. pneumoniae infections whose treatments were considered clinical failures 4-6 weeks after enrollment had not been treated with macrolides. Our study confirms that M. pneumoniae and/or C. pneumoniae plays a significant role in community-acquired LRTIs in children of all ages and that such infections have a more complicated course when not treated with adequate antimicrobial agents.Rapid optimization of antimicrobial chemotherapy given to pediatric patients with community-acquired pneumonia using PCR techniques with serology and standard culture.Children (n = 117; mean age 2.4 +/- 2.9 years) were diagnosed as having community-acquired pneumonia (CAP) using clinical symptoms, chest X-rays, and hematological data. The causative pathogen was determined using real-time polymerase chain reaction (PCR) (6 bacteria), multiple reverse transcription-PCR (MPCR; 11 viruses), bacterial culture, and serology. The initial chemotherapy was evaluated based on the pathogens identified using PCR. We found 27 viral cases (23.1%), 25 bacterial cases (21.4%), 45 mixed infections with virus and bacteria (38.5%), 10 Mycoplasma pneumoniae (8.5%), 7 mixed infections with M. pneumoniae and another pathogen (6.0%), 1 Chlamydophila pneumoniae (0.9%), and 2 unknown pathogens (1.7%). Streptococcus pneumoniae and Haemophilus influenzae accounted for 58 (49.5%) and 27 (23.0%) of the cases, respectively. The median values (50%) of the white blood cell count (WBC) and C-reactive protein (CRP) using the box-and-whisker and plot method, respectively, were 11.7 x 10(3) mm(-3) and 1.4 mg/dl in viral infections, 15.6 x 10(3) mm(-3) and 4.8 mg/dl in mixed infections with virus and bacteria, 17.8 x 10(3) mm(-3) and 6.3 mg/dl in bacterial infections, 6.7 x 10(3) mm(-3) and 1.4 mg/dl in M. pneumoniae infections, and 21.5 x 10(3) mm(-3) and 6.4 mg/dl in mixed infections with M. pneumoniae and other bacterial infections. Sulbactam/ampicillin (n = 61), carbapenems (n = 12), and ceftriaxone (n = 7) were selected for the patients suspected of having bacterial infections alone or mixed infections with bacterial and viruses in accordance with our criteria defined tentatively. For those with M. pneumoniae and C. pneumoniae infections, azithromycin or minocycline was initially used. Treatments averaged 3-5 days. The empirical chemotherapy was improper in 9.4% of cases in relation to the etiologic agents finally identified. We conclude that rapid and comprehensive identification using PCR can provide optimal antimicrobial chemotherapy for CAP patients.Role of Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydia pneumoniae in children with community-acquired pneumonia in Istanbul, Turkey.To investigate the role of Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydia pneumoniae infection in pediatric pneumonia, in Istanbul, Turkey, we conducted a prospective study covering all the children between 2 months and 15 years hospitalized for community-acquired pneumonia.A total of 140 children (85 males, median age 2.5 years) with community-acquired pneumonia were enrolled. Acute and convalescent sera were tested for IgM and IgG antibodies to M. pneumoniae (enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay, Serion ELISA classic) and for IgM and IgG antibodies to C. pneumoniae (microimmunofluorescence, Savyon, Israel).Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection was diagnosed in 38 patients (27%) and C. pneumoniae infection in 7 (5%). In 2 children M. pneumoniae and C. pneumoniae co infection was observed. The average age of the M. pneumoniae cases was 5.3 years and that of the C. pneumoniae was 1.5 years. The average age of pneumonia cases caused by other pathogens was 3.4 years (p<0.05). No significant difference was observed in clinical onset, signs, symptoms and laboratory parameters in children with M. pneumoniae and C. pneumoniae infection and in those without M. pneumoniae and C. pneumoniae infection.The results of this study suggest a remarkable role for M. pneumoniae and C. pneumoniae in childhood community-acquired pneumonia, and the knowledge of the true prevalence of these two types of infections discovered in the community might lead to modifications in the present empirical treatment of bacterial pneumonia.Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydia pneumoniae infections in children with pneumonia. Mowgli Study Group.The most common clinical signs, host responses and radiographic patterns were studied in 203 Italian children hospitalized for community-acquired pneumonia in order to clarify the role of clinical and radiological characteristics in the diagnosis of Mycoplasma pneumoniae and/or Chlamydia pneumoniae infections. Antibody measurements in paired sera and polymerase chain reaction on nasopharyngeal aspirates were used to establish the diagnoses of acute M. pneumoniae and C. pneumoniae infection, and the aetiologic data were correlated with the clinical, laboratory and radiographic data obtained on admission. No significant association was observed between evidence of M. pneumoniae and/or C. pneumoniae infection and periods of episode during the year, mean age of the study subjects, individual symptoms, physical findings or laboratory test results. Furthermore, no significant correlation was observed in relation to the radiological findings and M. pneumoniae and/or C. pneumoniae infection. This study shows that neither clinical findings nor laboratory parameters distinguished Mycoplasma pneumoniae and/or Chlamydia pneumoniae infection in children with pneumonia. Radiological findings also have a limited capacity to differentiate aetiologic agents. The priorities for future research include the development of rapid, easily accessible and cost-effective diagnostic tests useful for each episode of pneumonia in children.Frequency of Chlamydia pneumoniae and Mycoplasma pneumoniae infections in children.Chlamydia pneumoniae and Mycoplasma pneumoniae are among the most important pathogens of acute respiratory infections in children between the ages of 5 and 15 years. We aimed to investigate seasonal frequency of respiratory infections caused by C. pneumoniae and M. pneumoniae, frequency of coinfection, clinical findings and to determine relationship between clinical findings and laboratory results.Total of 284 patients (ranging 5-15 years of age), admitted to out-patient clinic with symptoms of respiratory tract infections between January 2004 and June 2005, were enrolled in the study. IgA, IgG and IgM antibodies against C. pneumoniae were quantitatively detected in all serum samples by using microimmunofluorescence (MIF). For the M. pneumoniae infection an IgM titer in the ELISA test were analyzed. Nasopharyngeal smear samples were collected for PCR detection.Mean age was 8 +/- 2.2 (range 5-14) years. Mycoplasma pneumoniae IgM in 86 (30.2%) cases, C. pneumoniae IgM in one (0.3%) case, IgA in six (2.1%) cases and IgG in 10 (3.5%) cases were found positive. In 10 (3.5%) cases, both C. pneumoniae IgG (a titer of >1/216) and M. pneumoniae IgM were found positive concomitantly. The M. pneumoniae IgM in winter was found significantly higher compared to other seasons. Mycoplasma pneumoniae PCR method was performed on a total of 203 samples in 33 (16.2%) of which M. pneumoniae was found positive. The false positive ratio of PCR technique was found 16.2%. In a total of 217 examined samples by PCR method, the DNA of C. pneumoniae was found positive in two patients.Mycoplasma pneumoniae was a common pathogen in respiratory infections. The otherwise C. pneumoniae infections were rarely seen in children. A Comparison of serology diagnostic tests for M. pneumoniae infections was found more sensitive and specific than PCR.Comparative randomized trial of azithromycin versus erythromycin and amoxicillin for treatment of community-acquired pneumonia in children.Our objective was to compare the clinical efficacy of azithromycin vs. erythromycin and amoxicillin in the treatment of presumed bacterial community-acquired pneumonia in ambulatory children, and to evaluate the etiologies of these illnesses. One hundred and ten children, aged 1 month to 14 years, were enrolled between January 1996-January 1999. Children were distributed into two groups according to clinical and radiological patterns: classic or atypical pneumonia. Patients with classic pneumonia were randomly assigned to receive oral amoxicillin 75 mg/kg/day for 7 days, or azithromycin 10 mg/kg/day for 3 days; patients with atypical pneumonia received azithromycin 10 mg/kg/day for 3 days, or erythromycin 50 mg/kg/day for 14 days. Chest X-ray, clinical, and laboratory parameters were obtained on enrollment. Clinic visits were performed on days 3, 7, and 14, and chest X-ray follow-up on days 7 and 14. Microbiological diagnosis of classic pathogens was based on blood and bronchial secretion cultures. The diagnosis of atypical pathogens C. pneumoniae, C. trachomatis, and M. pneumoniae was based on PCR and serologic tests.Forty-seven children met the criteria for classic pneumonia (23 children received azithromycin, and 24 received amoxicillin), and 59 children had atypical pneumonia (33 children were treated with azithromycin, and 26 with erythromycin). Demographic characteristics at enrollment were similar between children with classic pneumonia treated with azithromycin and erythromycin and children treated with azithromycin and erythromycin for atypical pneumonia. However, on day 7, children with classic pneumonia who received azithromycin normalized their chest X-ray more often than those who received amoxicillin (81.0% vs. 60.9%, respectively, P = 0.009). The same was true for children with atypical pneumonia; their chest X-rays had normalized by day 14 (100% in those with azithromycin vs. 81% in those with erythromycin, P = 0.059). Also, children with atypical pneumonia treated with azithromycin had earlier cessation of cough than children treated with erythromycin (3.6 +/- 1.9 vs. 5.5 +/- 3.6 days respectively, P = 0.02). There were only three children with side effects (mild diarrhea, all in the erythromycin group). Etiological agents were identified in 41% of children. In conclusion, azithromycin is an effective therapeutic option for the treatment of community-acquired classic and atypical pneumonia in children.Mycoplasma pneumonia in young children, 2-5 years of age.Mycoplasma pneumoniae is one of the most common causes of childhood community-acquired pneumonia (CAP), particularly in school-age children. Information regarding this infection in pre-school age children is lacking.To determine the prevalence of M. pneumoniae in young children aged under 5 years with CAP.This prospective study was conducted at Queen Sirikit National Institute of Child Health (QSNICH), Bangkok, Thailand between December 2001 and November 2002. We enrolled children aged 2 to 5 years with a clinical and radiological diagnosis of CAP. Acute and convalescent sera were collected and measured by using a particle agglutination test. Polymerase chain reaction (PCR) assay for M. pneumoniae was detected from nasopharyngeal secretions. Criteria for diagnosis were defined as > or = 4-found rising of mycoplasma antibody or titer > or = 1:160 with positive PCR.Thirteen out of 113 CAP patients were diagnosed as mycoplasma pneumonia. Three of them were diagnosed by > or = 4-fold rising of mycoplasma antibody while another 10 patients were diagnosed by mycoplasma titer > or = 1:160 with positive PCR for M. pneumoniae. Clinical symptoms and signs of these 13 mycoplasma pneumonia in young patients were fever (85%), cough (92%), dyspnea (85%), diarrhea (15%), rales (85%), wheezing or rhonchi (46%), and skin rash (15%). Leucocytosis (wbc > 15,000/cumm) was found in 46%. Chest x-rays revealed interstitial infiltration (71%), patchy infiltration (29%) and no pleural effusion was detected. Choices of antibiotic were erythromycin (31%), beta lactam antibiotics (61%), and antibiotic was not prescribed in one patient (8%). Sixty-nine percent of the patients improved, while 31% did not, possibly due to the use of beta lactam antibiotics, or non use of antibiotics.Mycopalsma pneumonia is not uncommon in children aged 2-5 years with CAP. Clinical signs, symptoms and radiological findings are non-specific and cannot be differentiated from other causes of CAP.Prevalence of Mycoplasma and Chlamydia pneumonia in severe community-acquired pneumonia among hospitalized children in Thailand.Pneumonia is the leading cause of pediatric morbidity and mortality worldwide, and Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydia pneumoniae are the two most common atypical pathogens. This study was designed to determine the prevalence and clinical impact of mycoplasma and chlamydia pneumonia in children hospitalized with severe pneumonia. Children 1 month-15 years old with a diagnosis of severe pneumonia (WHO criteria) were recruited between March 2005 and March 2006. Serologic studies were performed for anti-M. pneumoniae and anti-C. pneumoniae IgG/M on admission and 2-4 weeks afterward using ELISA. Of 52 patients, 13 (25%) were positive for Mycoplasma, 8 (15%) were positive for Chlamydia, 4 (7.6%) were positive for a mixed infection and 27 (52%) were negative. The subjects' mean age was 23.8+/-4.1 months. The mean of initial oxygen saturation on admission was 87.5+/-1.2%. Fever and prolonged cough were the leading symptoms. The mean of hospitalization was 18.8+/-2.6 days, chlamydia pneumonia had the longest duration, 30+/-10.2 days and 13/52 (25%) study subjects developed respiratory failure. Only 10% were treated with adequate antibiotic prior to serologic results. There was one mortality (1/52, 2%). Our study suggests that mycoplasma and chlamydia infections are commonly found among children hospitalized with severe pneumonia. Coverage with an appropriate antibiotic should be considered to hasten recovery.Epidemiology and clinical characteristics of community-acquired pneumonia in hospitalized children.The precise epidemiology of childhood pneumonia remains poorly defined. Accurate and prompt etiologic diagnosis is limited by inadequate clinical, radiologic, and laboratory diagnostic methods. The objective of this study was to determine as precisely as possible the epidemiology and morbidity of community-acquired pneumonia in hospitalized children.Consecutive immunocompetent children hospitalized with radiographically confirmed lower respiratory infections (LRIs) were evaluated prospectively from January 1999 through March 2000. Positive blood or pleural fluid cultures or pneumolysin-based polymerase chain reaction assays, viral direct fluorescent antibody tests, or viral, mycoplasmal, or chlamydial serologic tests were considered indicative of infection by those organisms. Methods for diagnosis of pneumococcal pneumonia among study subjects were published by us previously. Selected clinical characteristics, indices of inflammation (white blood cell and differential counts and procalcitonin values), and clinical outcome measures (time to defervescence and duration of oxygen supplementation and hospitalization) were compared among groups of children.One hundred fifty-four hospitalized children with LRIs were enrolled. Median age was 33 months (range: 2 months to 17 years). A pathogen was identified in 79% of children. Typical respiratory bacteria were identified in 60% (of which 73% were Streptococcus pneumoniae), viruses in 45%, Mycoplasma pneumoniae in 14%, Chlamydia pneumoniae in 9%, and mixed bacterial/viral infections in 23%. Preschool-aged children had as many episodes of atypical bacterial LRIs as older children. Children with typical bacterial or mixed bacterial/viral infections had the greatest inflammation and disease severity. Multivariate logistic-regression analyses revealed that high temperature (> or = 38.4 degrees C) within 72 hours after admission (odds ratio: 2.2; 95% confidence interval: 1.4-3.5) and the presence of pleural effusion (odds ratio: 6.6; 95% confidence interval: 2.1-21.2) were significantly associated with bacterial pneumonia.This study used an expanded diagnostic armamentarium to define the broad spectrum of pathogens that cause pneumonia in hospitalized children. The data confirm the importance of S pneumoniae and the frequent occurrence of bacterial and viral coinfections in children with pneumonia. These findings will facilitate age-appropriate antibiotic selection and future evaluation of the clinical effectiveness of the pneumococcal conjugate vaccine as well as other candidate vaccines.High prevalence of Mycoplasma pneumoniae in patients with respiratory tract symptoms: a rapid detection method.Serodiagnosis of acute respiratory infections in children in Georgia.To investigate the etiology of acute respiratory infections in hospitalized children.A total of 808 children were studied. Investigation of RSV, Adenovirus, Parainfluenza, Influenza A and B, C.trachomatis, C.pneumoniae, M. pneumonia and Legionella were performed with an ELISA for IgM, IgG and IgA antibodies detection.There were 496 males and 312 females giving a male: female ratio of 1.6:1. Ages range from 1 month to 15 years. The overall detection rate was 57.9%. The most frequently detected were: parainfluenza 12.6%, adenovirus 11.2%, influenza A 7.3%, RSV 6%, M. pneumoniae 5.4%, C.trachomatis 3.5% and mixed-infections 9.2%. Pneumonia was associated most frequently with adenovirus and mixed-infections; wheezing bronchitis--with adenovirus, RSV and M. pneumoniae; bronchitis--with parainfluenza and adenovirus, diseases of upper respiratory tract--with parainfluenza and adenovirus. Peak of the virus activity was during winter (influenza, parainfluenza, adenovirus, RSV) and autumn (parainfluenza, RSV).Viruses are the main causes of ARI in Georgian children. A better understanding of the etiology of ARI in all of the regions of the world may be helpful for timely decision of specific therapy, which can help pediatricians to estimate and manage children with ARI.Community-acquired pneumonia in children in Lambarene, Gabon.Community-acquired pneumonia (CAP) accounts for more than two million deaths per year in children < 5 years of age. Recognition of pathogens is vital for guiding antibiotic treatment. In Gabon, no epidemiologic data on childhood CAP were available to help guide antibiotic therapy. We conducted a prospective, hospital-based, cross-sectional survey at the Albert Schweitzer Hospital, Lambarene, Gabon, to assess the importance of atypical organisms (Chlamydia pneumoniae, Mycoplasma pneumoniae, Bordetella pertussis, and Legionella pneumophila) and Streptococcus pneumoniae in the etiology of CAP in children by means of real-time polymerase chain reaction, cell culture, and serology. Collectively, atypical bacteria accounted for 11% of cases with a special emphasis on B. pertussis, accounting for 6% of cases. Clinical differentiation of atypical from typical pneumonia in children remains challenging. Molecular diagnostic methods offer fast and highly sensitive diagnostic tools and would be able to help guide antimicrobial therapy in rural areas where follow-up is difficult.Etiology of community-acquired pneumonia in hospitalized school-age children: evidence for high prevalence of viral infections.Community-acquired pneumonia (CAP) in young children is most commonly associated with viral infections; however, the role of viruses in CAP of school-age children is still inconclusive.Seventy-five school-age children hospitalized with CAP were prospectively evaluated for the presence of viral and bacterial pathogens. Nasopharyngeal washes were examined by polymerase chain reaction for viruses and atypical bacteria. Antibody assays to detect bacterial pathogens in acute-phase and convalescent-phase serum samples were also performed.A viral infection was identified in 65% of cases. Rhinovirus RNA was detected in 45% of patients; infection with another virus occurred in 31%. The most common bacterial pathogen was Mycoplasma pneumoniae, which was diagnosed in 35% of cases. Chlamydia pneumoniae DNA was not detected in any patient; results of serological tests were positive in only 2 patients (3%). Mixed infections were documented in 35% of patients, and the majority were a viral-bacterial combination.The high prevalence of viral and mixed viral-bacterial infections supports the notion that the presence of a virus, acting either as a direct or an indirect pathogen, may be the rule rather than the exception in the development of CAP in school-age children requiring hospitalization.Incidence of community-acquired pneumonia in children caused by Mycoplasma pneumoniae: serological results of a prospective, population-based study in primary health care.The objective of the present study was to assess the incidence of community-acquired pneumonia (CAP) in children caused by Mycoplasma pneumoniae.During 12 months in 1981-1982, all CAP cases in a defined child population were registered. M. pneumoniae aetiology, initially measured by complement fixation (CF) test, was in 1999 supplemented by measurement of IgG and IgM antibodies using enzyme immunoassays (EIA).M. pneumoniae was detected in 61 (30%) of 201 paediatric CAP cases, being the most common aetiological agent in those 5 years of age or over. At that age, M. pneumoniae was responsible for over 50% of cases, and over 90% of mycoplasmal cases were treated as outpatients. The EIA detected 17 new cases over and above the 44 detected by CF, while CF alone revealed 10 cases. The incidence of M. pneumoniae CAP increased with age, being over 10/1000 children at the age of 10 years or more. Co-infections with Streptococcus pneumoniae and Chlamydia pneumoniae were present in over 30% and 15%, respectively, of mycoplasmal CAP cases.M. pneumoniae is a common cause of paediatric CAP in primary health care, and co-infections with S. pneumoniae are common. Both S. pneumoniae and M. pneumoniae should be taken into account when starting antibiotics for children with CAP.Community acquired pneumonia--a prospective UK study.There are few data on paediatric community acquired pneumonia (PCAP) in the UK.To investigate the aetiology and most useful diagnostic tests for PCAP in the north east of England.A prospective study of hospital admissions with a diagnosis of PCAP.A pathogen was isolated from 60% (81/136) of cases, and considered a definite or probable cause of their pneumonia in 51% (70/136). Fifty (37%) had a virus implicated (65% respiratory syncytial virus) and 19 (14%) a bacterium (7% group A streptococcus, 4% Streptococcus pneumoniae), with one mixed infection. Of a subgroup (51 patients) in whom serum antipneumolysin antibody testing was performed, 6% had evidence of pneumococcal infection, and all were under 2 years old. The best diagnostic yield was from paired serology (34%, 31/87), followed by viral immunofluorescence (33%, 32/98).Viral infection accounted for 71% of the cases diagnosed. Group A streptococcus was the most common bacterial infective agent, with a low incidence of both Mycoplasma pneumoniae and S pneumoniae. Pneumococcal pneumonia was the most common bacterial cause of pneumonia in children under 2 years but not in older children. Inflammatory markers and chest x ray features did not differentiate viral from bacterial pneumonia; serology and viral immunofluorescence were the most useful diagnostic tests.Prospective surveillance for atypical pathogens in children with community-acquired pneumonia in Japan.A total of 141 children with community-acquired pneumonia (CAP) were studied prospectively to determine the causative microorganisms. Microbial investigations included examination of postnasal swabs, cultures, polymerase chain reaction (PCR), and serology. The atypical pathogens occurring most frequently were Mycoplasma pneumoniae (58 patients [41.1%]), Chlamydia pneumoniae (4 patients [2.8%]), and concurrent occurrence of both pathogens (1 patient [0.7%]). Patients aged under 4 years showed a relatively lower rate of atypical bacterial etiology compared with those aged 4 years or older. Major bacterial pathogens were detected in 89 patients (atypical pathogens were detected in 28 patients simultaneously), including Streptococcus pneumoniae in 34 patients, Haemophilus influenzae in 60, Moraxella catarrhalis in 48, and multiple pathogens in 42. In patients suspected of having atypical pneumonia, macrolides are recommended.Acute lower respiratory tract infections in hospitalized patients with diarrhea in Dhaka, Bangladesh.This study focused on 401 children less than 5 years old who were hospitalized with acute lower respiratory tract infection (ALRI) and diarrhea in Dhaka, Bangladesh, and who were investigated for the presence of both bacterial and viral respiratory tract pathogens as well as for selected diarrheal pathogens. The most common manifestations of ALRI were pneumonia (374 cases), bronchiolitis (12 cases), and tracheobronchitis (11 cases). The majority (77%) of the illnesses were in children less than 2 years of age, and 88% of the children were malnourished. A respiratory tract pathogen was identified in 30% of the patients, and a diarrheal pathogen was identified in 34%. The overall case-fatality rate in children with ALRI and diarrhea was 8%. The case-fatality rate was 14% in children with bacterial pneumonia and diarrhea, 3% in those with viral pneumonia and diarrhea, and 14% in malnourished children with shigellosis and ALRI. The most common respiratory tract pathogens were respiratory syncytial virus, Streptococcus pneumoniae, influenza viruses, and Haemophilus influenzae type b.Prevalence and clinical features of mycoplasma pneumoniae in Thai children.To determine the prevalence and clinical features of mycoplasma pneumoniae in Thai children with community acquired pneumonia (CAP).Diagnosis of current infection was based on > or = 4 fold rise in antibody sera or persistently high antibody titers together with the presence of mycoplasma DNA in respiratory secretion. The clinical features were compared between children who tested positive for M pneumoniae, and those whose results were negative.Current infection due to M. pneumoniae was diagnosed in 36 (15%) of 245 children with paired sera. The sensitivity and specificity of polymerase chain reaction (PCR) in diagnosing current infection in the present study were 78% and 98% respectively. The mean age of children with mycoplasma pneumoniae was higher than CAP with unspecified etiology. The presenting manifestations and initial laboratory finding were insufficient to predict mycoplasma pneumoniae precisely, the presence of chest pain and lobar consolidation on chest X-ray, however, were significant findings in children with mycoplasma pneumoniae.The present study confirms that M. pneumoniae plays a significant role in CAP in children of all ages. Children with this infection should be identified in order to administer the appropriate antibiotic treatment.Clinical comparative study of azithromycin versus erythromycin in the treatment of acute respiratory tract infections in children.The efficacy and tolerability of azithromycin and erythromycin in the treatment of acute respiratory tract infections in children were compared in an open, multicenter, randomized trial. A total of 151 children, aged from 2 months to 14 years, suffering from upper airways infections (60), or lower respiratory tract infections (91), were randomized to be treated either with azithromycin, 10 mg/Kg/day per os once daily for 3 or 10 mg/Kg/day 1 and 5 mg/Kg/days 2-5 (77 patients) or with erythromycin, 50 mg/Kg/day thrice daily for at least 7 days (74 patients). The two treatment groups did not significantly differ as to sex, age, weight, type and severity of infection, and infecting pathogens. Clinical evaluation was performed prior to therapy, on treatment days 1, 3, 5 and 7, and on day 10. Microbiological and laboratory assessment were carried out at baseline and after the end of therapeutic course. Chest X-ray and serologic assays for Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection were obtained in patients suspected to have lower respiratory tract infections. At the end of therapy, clinical cure was achieved in 73 out of 77 patients (94.8%) in the azithromycin group, and in 60/72 evaluable subjects (83.3%) in the erythromycin group. A significantly more rapid remission of several illness-related signs and symptoms was observed in patients treated with azithromycin. A total of 75 bacterial pathogens were isolated at baseline microbiological examination; at the end of the therapeutic course bacteriological eradication was obtained in 34/34 cases (100%) treated with azithromycin, and in 40/41 children (97.5%) treated with erythromycin.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)[Community acquired pneumonia in children].Community acquired pneumonia is responsible for a high morbidity in children. The etiological diagnosis is not always easy and treatment remains probabilistic.To analysis clinical patterns and the outcome of community acquired pneumonia and to find arguments in favour of its origin.A prospective analysis of the files of 39 children (20 boys, 19 girls) hospitalized between (1 december 2004 - 30 june 2005) for community acquired pneumonia was performed. Included dchildren whad between 6 months and 15 years-old.The mean age was of 3 years and three months. Germ was identified in 41% of cases: Mycoplasma pneumoniae was the most important germ found in 9 cases, pneumococcus was found in 4 cases and hemophilus in four cases. Coinfection pneumococcus and mycoplasma were found in two cases. None virus was identified. We have separated two groups: bacterial pneumonia and pneumoniae without definite etiology. Fat cough was associated to bacterial pneumonia. mycoplama pneumoniae was significantly associated with high fever and dry cough. We haven't found any others associations between clinical, biological or radiological patterns and the two groups of pneumonia. C-reactive protein more than 66 mg/l has sensitivity of 77%, specificity of 73.3%, positive predictive value of 46.7% of and negative predictive value of 91.7%. The outcome was favourable in all cases.Theses results showed the necessity to improve our microbiological methods to identify infectious agents of pneumonia. Mycoplasma pneumonia seems to be a frequent germ in preschool children.Mycoplasma pneumoniae in children with pneumonia at Mbagathi District Hospital, Nairobi.To determine the prevalence of mycoplasma pneumoniae in nasopharyngeal aspirates of children under five years of age suffering from pneumonia.Cross-sectional survey.Two primer sets targeting the genes coding for adhesion protein and 16S rRNA were used in PCR and M. pneumoniae specific antibodies were detected using commercial article agglutination kit. Microbiological investigations to isolate common acute respiratory infectious pathogens were also carried out.M. pneumoniae was detected in nasopharyngeal aspirates of 33.7% of the cases by PCR while serology was positive in only 4.1%. M. pneumoniae alone (single detection) was detected in 25% of the cases while 75% occurred with other acute respiratory infectious (ARI) pathogens. However, the results did not correlate with clinical outcome or the severity of pneumonia. No significant aetiology was found in 28% of the cases investigated, however microbiological investigations by culture revealed the presence of other aetiological agents as follows: Streptococcus pneumoniae (26%), Klebsiella pneumoniae (1%), Staphylococcus aureus (3%), E. coli (2%), parainfluenza viruses (5%), Salmonella(1%), adenovirus (4%), RSV (22%) and Candida spp(13%), Mycoplasma pneumoniae was more prevalent in children aged between six months and three years. Cases of M. pneumoniae PCR positive and S. pneumoniae exhibited similar seasonal distribution with peaks in May and September. However, there was no relationship between M. pneumoniae PCR positive and the severity of pneumonia.More investigation is required to establish the significance of atypical pathogens in respiratory infections in Kenya.Serological study of acute respiratory tract infection in children with reference to Mycoplasma pneumoniae complement fixing and cold hemagglutinating antibodies.Prevalence of Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydia pneumoniae in children with community acquired pneumonia.A prospective one year study was performed on 62 children admitted at the All India Institute of Medical Sciences with community acquired pneumonia (CAP) for the prevalence of Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydia pneumoniae. Diagnosis of infection with M. pneumoniae was based on serological tests viz microparticle agglutination test for detection of IgM antibodies and indirect immunofluorescence test for antigen detection from throat swabs (sensitivity 85.7%, specificity 93.3%). The indirect solid-phase enzyme immunoassay for detection of IgG antibodies was used to determine the prevalence of C. pneumoniae (sensitivity 88.8%, specificity 75.8%). Seventeen patients (27.4%) were found to have serological evidence of M. pneumoniae infection whereas only 4 (6.4%) patients were seropositive for C. pneumoniae. Results of this study indicate that M. Pneumoniae plays a significant role in CAP in infants and young children. Thus specialized laboratory testing for these agents should be more widely used thereby affecting empiric antibiotic regimens.An explosive outbreak of Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection in a summer camp.An outbreak of Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection occurred in the summer of 1978 in a boys' camp in northern Wisconsin and affected 139 of 196 persons (71%); 115 (59%) had laboratory evidence of infection. In 77% of the cases, onset of disease occurred within three weeks after arrival at camp, in contrast to the usually indolent spread of the disease. Attack rates decreased with increasing age. The sensitivity of serology for detecting M pneumoniae disease may have been as low as 79%. There was shorter duration of cough in those treated with erythromycin within four days after onset of symptoms.Etiology and severity of community acquired pneumonia in children from Uruguay: a 4-year study.The 4-year study (1987-1990) covered the major clinical-epidemiological characteristics of pneumonia in children as diagnosed at the emergency service of the Children's Hospital, as well as etiologies, and factors involved in the most severe cases. Etiology was determined in 47.7% of the 541 pneumonia cases, involving 283 pathogens of which 38.6% were viruses and 12.6% bacteria. Viral and mixed etiologies were more frequent in children under 12 months of age. Bacteria predominated in ages between 6 and 23 months. Among the viruses, respiratory syncytial virus predominated (66%). The bacterial pneumonias accounted for 12.2% of the recognized etiologies. The most important bacterial agents were S. pneumoniae (64%) and H. influenzae (19%). H. influenzae and mixed infections had a relevant participation during the 1988 season, pointing to annual variations in the relative participation of pathogens and its possible implication in severity of diseases. Correlation of severity and increased percentage of etiological diagnosis was assessed: patients with respiratory rates over 70 rpm, or pleural effusion and/or extensive pulmonary parenchyma compromise yielded higher positive laboratory results. Various individual and family risk factors were recognized when comparing pneumonia children with healthy controls.Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection in children with acute respiratory infection.A prospective study was performed on 93 children admitted to Kasturba Medical College Hospital, Manipal and TMA Pai Rotary Hospital of Udupi and Karkala. Blood samples from 93 children admitted to the ward with no respiratory illness were taken as age-matched controls for the inpatients, IgM antibody against Mycoplasma pneumoniae was detected using a commercial kit (Virion-Serion ELISA, Germany) following the manufacturer's instructions. 23.96% of the inpatients with respiratory tract symptoms had IgM antibodies against Mycoplasma pneumoniae. The highest infection rate was found to be in the 2-5 and 5-10 year age group. The most common mode of presentation was an upper respiratory focus of infection with cervical lymphadenopathy. Bronchial breathing signifying pneumonic consolidation was significantly less in the Mycoplasma positive group (p = 0.006). There was no statistically significant difference in the radiological findings in the Mycoplasma positive and Mycoplasma negative groups.Acute lower respiratory tract infection due to Chlamydia and Mycoplasma spp. in Egyptian children under 5 years of age.Mixed community-acquired pneumonia in hospitalised patients.The role of mixed community-acquired pneumonia (CAP) is controversial. The aim of the present study was to determine the incidence, principal microbial patterns, clinical predictors and course of mixed CAP. The current study included 1,511 consecutive hospitalised patients with CAP. Of these, 610 (40%) patients had an established aetiology. One pathogen was demonstrated in 528 patients and 82 (13%) patients had mixed pneumonia. Cases including CAP, by a pyogenic bacteria and a complete paired serology for "atypicals", revealed that 82 (13%) patients had definite single pyogenic pneumonia and 28 patients (5%) had mixed pyogenic pneumonia. In patients with mixed CAP, Streptococcus pneumoniae was the most prevalent microorganism (44 out of 82; 54%). The most frequent combination was S. pneumoniae with Haemophilus influenzae (17 out of 82; 21%). Influenza virus A and S. pneumoniae (five out of 28; 18%) was the most frequent association in the mixed pyogenic pneumonia group. No clinical predictors for mixed pneumonias could be identified. Patients with mixed pyogenic pneumonia more frequently developed shock when compared with patients with single pyogenic pneumonia (18 versus 4%). In conclusion, mixed pneumonia occurs in >10% of cases with community-acquired pneumonia requiring hospitalisation.Rapid diagnosis of Mycoplasma pneumoniae by polymerase chain reaction in community-acquired lower respiratory tract infections.Two hundred children hospitalized for community-acquired lower respiratory tract infections (LRTIs) were investigated for Mycoplasma pneumoniae employing serological tests and a P1 adhesin gene-based polymerase chain reaction assay (PCR) on nasopharyngeal aspirates. Serological evidence of M. pneumoniae infection was observed in 68 (34%) patients and PCR was positive in 20 (10%) children. Together PCR and/or enzyme immuno assay detected M. pneumoniae in 71(35.5%) children. Our data underline the role of M. pneumoniae in Indian children with community-acquired LRTIs even in children aged < 24 months.Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydophila pneumoniae in children with community-acquired pneumonia in Thailand.The prevalence of community-acquired pneumonia (CAP) caused by atypical pathogens in Thai children is unknown.To examine the prevalence of Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydophila pneumoniae infections in paediatric patients (aged 2-15 years) with CAP in three academic hospitals using standardised laboratory techniques. The characteristics of atypical pneumonia were also compared with other causes of CAP.Diagnosis of current infection was based on a four-fold or more rise in antibody serum samples or persistently high antibody titres together with the presence of mycoplasmal or chlamydial DNA in secretions.Of 245 patients with CAP, 17.5% of cases were caused by atypical pathogens (M. pneumoniae 14.3%, C. pneumoniae 2.8% and co-infection 0.4%). We also found atypical pathogens in young children aged 2-5 years. The clinical and laboratory findings did not distinguish atypical pneumonia from other CAPs. Segmental or lobar consolidation on chest X-rays was more common in atypical pneumonia, while dyspnoea was more prominent in other CAPs.Our data show a high prevalence of M. pneumoniae and C. pneumoniae in Thai children with CAP, including in children aged 2-5 years.Atypical bacterial pathogens in community-acquired pneumonia in children: a hospital-based study.A total of 243 children aged one month to five years with World Health Organization defined severe community acquired pneumonia were studied for the presence of atypical bacterial pathogens: 24 were found positive for mycoplasma infection. There was no significant association with any of the clinical, laboratory and radiological variables in children with pneumonia by the atypical pathogen.Differentiation of bacterial and viral pneumonia in children.A study was undertaken to investigate the differential diagnostic role of chest radiographic findings, total white blood cell count (WBC), erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), and serum C reactive protein (CRP) in children with community acquired pneumonia of varying aetiology.The study population consisted of 254 consecutive children admitted to hospital with community acquired pneumonia diagnosed between 1993 and 1995. WBC, ESR, and CRP levels were determined on admission. Seventeen infective agents (10 viruses and seven bacteria) were searched for. Chest radiographs were retrospectively and separately reviewed by three paediatric radiologists.A potential causative agent was found in 215 (85%) of the 254 cases. Bacterial infection was found in 71% of 137 children with alveolar infiltrates on the chest radiograph, while 72% of the 134 cases with a bacterial pneumonia had alveolar infiltrates. Half of the 77 children with solely interstitial infiltrates on the chest radiograph had evidence of bacterial infection. The proportion of patients with increased WBC or ESR did not differ between bacterial and viral pneumonias, but differences in the CRP levels of >40 mg/l, >80 mg/l, and >120 mg/l were significant although the sensitivity for detecting bacterial pneumonia was too low for use in clinical practice.Most children with alveolar pneumonia, especially those with lobar infiltrates, have laboratory evidence of a bacterial infection. Interstitial infiltrates are seen in both viral and bacterial pneumonias.Community-acquired pneumonia in patients requiring hospitalization.This study aimed to investigate the microbial aetiology of community-acquired pneumonia (CAP) in patients requiring hospitalization.A prospective study of consecutive non-immunocompromised patients aged 12 years and above admitted with CAP from August 1997 to May 1999 was undertaken.Of 127 patients hospitalized for CAP, an aetiological diagnosis was achieved in 53 cases (41.7%). Klebsiella pneumoniae was the most frequently isolated pathogen and caused 10.2% of all the cases, followed by Streptococcus pneumoniae (5.5%), Haemophilus influenzae (5.5%), Mycoplasma pneumoniae (3.9%) and Pseudomonas aeruginosa (3.9%). Gram-negative bacilli were significantly more frequently identified in patients aged 60 years or older and in patients with comorbid illnesses. Twelve of 13 patients who died from CAP had other comorbid illnesses compared to 63 of 114 patients who survived (P = 0.014). Three of eight bacteraemic patients died compared with 10 of 119 non-bacteraemic patients (P = 0.035).The microbiology of CAP in patients requiring hospitalization in Malaysia appears to be different from that in Western countries. Gram-negative bacilli were more frequently isolated in older patients and in those with comorbidity. Mortality from CAP is more likely in patients with comorbidity and in those who are bacteraemic.An open, randomized, comparative study of clarithromycin and erythromycin in the treatment of children with community-acquired pneumonia.This study aimed to evaluate the efficacy and safety of clarithromycin and erythromycin in the treatment of community-acquired pneumonia in children.Children with community-acquired pneumonia were randomly assigned to receive 10-day regimens of either clarithromycin 15 mg/kg/day, twice a day, or erythromycin 30-50 mg/kg/day, four times daily.A total of 97 children entered this study, including 26 with Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection, 15 with Chlamydia pneumoniae infection, and 6 with mixed mycoplasma and chlamydia infections. Fifty and 47 children received clarithromycin and erythromycin treatment, respectively. Three children withdrew from the study because the identified pathogens were resistant to the study drugs. All 47 children with mycoplasma or chlamydia infection were cured clinically. Delayed defervescence, defined as a fever lasting for more than 72 h after treatment, was observed in 4 of 22 clarithromycin-treated children (18%) and in 3 of 15 erythromycin-treated children (20%) [p>0.05]. Gastrointestinal side effects, including vomiting, abdominal pain and diarrhea, were observed in 3 of 50 children (6%) receiving clarithromycin and in 11 of 49 children (22%) receiving erythromycin (p=0.039). Excluding children with abnormal pretreatment liver function, abnormal liver function after treatment was observed in only one child, treated with erythromycin. Post-treatment eosinophil and platelet counts were significantly elevated after treatment in both groups.Clarithromycin showed efficacy equivalent to erythromycin for the treatment of mycoplasma or chlamydia pneumonia in children. However, the tolerability of clarithromycin was superior to that of erythromycin.Pneumonia caused by Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydophila pneumoniae in children - comparative analysis of clinical picture.The aim of the study was comparative analysis of clinical picture and prevalence of pneumonia caused by Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydophila pneumoniae in children.The study involved 332 children hospitalized in the 3rd Department of Paediatric, Polish Mother's Memorial Hospital - Research Institute, due to pneumonia caused by Mycoplasma pneumoniae - group I or Chlamydophila pneumonia - group II.Over 2003-2009 period there were 1870 children hospitalized due to pneumonia, of which in 332 (17.8%) the Mycoplasma pneumoniae and/or Chlamydophila pneumoniae etiology was confirmed. Mycoplasma pneumoniae, Chlamydophila pneumoniae, and mixed infection was diagnosed in 198 (10.6%), 102 (5.5%), and 32 (1.7%) children, respectively. The dominant clinical feature in both groups was cough, observed in 186 (93.9%) and 88 (86.3%) children, respectively. Further, reddening of the throat, rhinitis, shortness of breath, fever, enlarged lymph nodes, skin lesions and dyspepsia were also observed. The frequency of specific clinical features in both groups was similar. Statistical relationship (p0.05) was observed only in case of skin lesions. In chest x-ray there was no statistical link as for analyzed changes. Interstitial inflammatory changes were most frequently observed.Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydophila pneumoniae are significant etiological factors in pneumonia in children, and as such they should be taken into consideration in differential diagnosis of pneumonia in children. The clinical picture of pneumonia caused by Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydophila pneumoniae is hardly specific, with basic labs and chest x-ray of little help in differentiation of infection etiology.Prospective study of the aetiology and outcome of pneumonia in the community.A prospective one-year study of community pneumonia was conducted in Nottingham. 236 of 251 episodes of pneumonia (defined as an acute lower respiratory tract infection, for which antibiotics were prescribed, associated with new focal signs on examination of the chest) were investigated. Acute radiographic changes were present in 93 (39%). A pathogen was identified in 129 (55%) episodes, with Streptococcus pneumoniae, Haemophilus influenzae, and influenza viruses those most frequently identified. Mycoplasma pneumoniae was uncommon and infection with Legionella pneumophila was found in only 1 episode. Hospital admission was required in 52 (22%) episodes. 7 patients died (3%), all but one of the deaths occurring in patients who had been admitted to hospital. Pneumonia in the community is common but few people die of it. Initial antibiotic therapy should always cover S pneumoniae and H influenzae.Community-acquired pneumonia of mixed etiology: prevalence, clinical characteristics, and outcome.Community-acquired pneumonia (CAP) of mixed etiology has increasingly been appreciated in the literature, but its clinical significance remains unknown. The aim of this analysis was to describe the prevalence, clinical characteristics, and outcome of CAP of mixed etiology. Data were obtained from a 2-year prospective study of consecutive patients with CAP in whom an extensive microbiological workup was performed. Predefined strict criteria were used to establish the etiology. A total of 493 patients were included. A single pathogen was detected in 222 (45%) cases and two or more pathogens in 28 (5.7%) cases. Mixed infections were seen across all age groups and in patients treated both in hospital and as outpatients. The most frequent combinations of pathogens were those of a bacterium plus an "atypical" organism (28.6%) and of two bacterial organisms (28.6%). Compared with patients with monomicrobial pneumonia, patients with mixed pneumonia were more likely to have underlying conditions (64% vs. 45%, p=0.04) and dementia (25% vs. 10%, p=0.02). The incidence of a defined series of complications was higher in patients with mixed pneumonia (39.3% vs. 18.6%; OR=2.84; p=0.02). Community-acquired pneumonia of mixed etiology is uncommon. Patients with mixed pneumonia are more likely to have underlying medical conditions, and they may have a more severe course of disease.Multipathogen infections in hospitalized children with acute respiratory infections.To explore the epidemiologic and clinical features of, and interactions among, multipathogen infections in hospitalized children with acute respiratory tract infection (ARTI). A prospective study of children admitted with ARTI was conducted. Peripheral blood samples were analyzed by indirect immunofluorescence to detect respiratory agents including respiratory syncytial virus; adenovirus; influenza virus (Flu) types A and B; parainfluenza virus (PIV) types 1, 2, and 3; chlamydia pneumonia; and mycoplasma pneumonia. A medical history of each child was taken.Respiratory agents were detected in 164 (51.9%) of 316 children with ARTI. A single agent was identified in 50 (15.8%) children, and multiple agents in 114 (36.1%). Flu A was the most frequently detected agent, followed by Flu B. Coinfection occurred predominantly in August and was more frequent in children between 3 and 6 years of age. A significantly higher proportion of Flu A, Flu B, and PIV 1 was detected in samples with two or more pathogens per sample than in samples with a single pathogen.Our study suggests that there is a high occurrence of multipathogen infections in children admitted with ARTI and that coinfection is associated with certain pathogens.Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Legionella pneumophila in community-acquired lower respiratory tract infections among hospitalized children: diagnosis by real time PCR.Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Legionella pneumophila are increasingly recognized as important agents of community-acquired lower respiratory tract infections (LRTI). Mycoplasma pneumoniae has been also recognized as a cause of nosocomial infections. The aim of this study was to investigate the role of real time polymerase chain reaction (PCR) for the rapid diagnosis of these infections among hospitalized children with community-acquired LRTI. During 2001, 65 children were prospectively studied. Microbiological investigation consisted of capillary PCR with a LightCycler for M. pneumoniae and L. pneumophila in induced sputum or throat swab specimens, IgM enzyme immunoassay for M. pneumoniae and immunofluorescence for L. pneumophila in paired sera. Serology testing showed acute M. pneumoniae infection in 18 (27.5%) patients and L. pneumophila in 1 (1.5%). M. pneumoniae was also detected in sputum specimen by capillary PCR in 9 (50%) serologically diagnosed cases, including 4 (22%) with non-diagnostic IgM levels in the acute phase. Capillary PCR and IgM enzyme immunoassay diagnosed together 15 (83%) M. pneumoniae cases in the acute phase. It is concluded that M. pneumoniae is an important cause of LRTI necessitating hospitalization among children in Greece. Capillary PCR in sputum may diagnose M. pneumoniae LRTI in the acute setting and direct therapy and isolation of patients.Role of Chlamydia pneumoniae and Mycoplasma pneumoniae as causative agents of community-acquired pneumonia in hospitalised children and adolescents.The aim of the study presented here was to determine the prevalence of Chlamydia pneumoniae versus Mycoplasma pneumoniae infections in paediatric patients with community-acquired pneumonia. A total of 50 patients (mean age, 5.5 years; median, 3.9 years) with community-acquired pneumonia were enrolled. Four patients were found to have Chlamydia pneumoniae infection (1 culture positive, 1 PCR positive and 2 serology positive) and 16 patients had Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection (2 PCR positive, 4 PCR and serology positive, 10 serology positive), including three patients with coinfection. The rates of Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection were 22%, 35% and 40% in children aged 1-3, >3-7 and >7 years, respectively. Acute Chlamydia pneumoniae infection was substantially less common than Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection in our study cohort.Etiology of community-acquired pneumonia in 254 hospitalized children.Childhood community-acquired pneumonia is a common illness, but there have been relatively few comprehensive studies of the viral and bacterial etiology in developed countries. The aim of the present investigation was to determine the etiology of community-acquired pneumonia in hospitalized children by several laboratory methods.In a 3-year prospective study a nasopharyngeal aspirate for viral studies and acute and convalescent serum samples for viral and bacterial serology were taken from 254 children with symptoms of acute infection and infiltrates compatible with pneumonia in the chest radiograph. The role of 17 microbes was investigated.A potential causative agent was detected in 215 (85%) of the 254 patients. Sixty-two percent of the patients had viral infection, 53% had bacterial infection and 30% had evidence of concomitant viral-bacterial infection. Streptococcus pneumoniae (37%), respiratory syncytial virus (29%) and rhinovirus (24%) were the most common agents associated with community-acquired pneumonia. Only one patient had a positive blood culture (S. pneumoniae) of 125 cultured. A dual viral infection was detected in 35 patients, and a dual bacterial infection was detected in 19 patients.The possible causative agent of childhood community-acquired pneumonia can be detected in most cases. Further studies are warranted to determine what etiologic investigations would aid in the management of pneumonia. With effective immunization for S. pneumoniae and respiratory syncytial virus infections, more than one-half of the pneumonia cases in this study could have been prevented.Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection in Yemen: incidence, presentation and antibiotic susceptibility.To determine the incidence, clinical presentation and antibiotic susceptibility of Mycoplasma pneumoniae at the main hospitals in Sana'a, we studied 405 patients clinically and radiographically diagnosed with lower respiratory tract infections aged 10-60 years. M. pneumoniae was identified by 3 different methods: culture, antigen detection and IgM serology. Antibiotic susceptibility testing was performed for confirmed isolates by macro-broth dilution technique. There were 125 patients (30.9%) with current infection, mostly among younger age groups, with bronchopneumonia the most common underlying clinical condition. All tested isolates were susceptible to all antibiotics in the in vitro antibiogram, with erythromycin the most active. The results indicate the need for different approaches in the diagnosis of M. pneumoniae infection in Yemen.[Prospective study of 221 community acquired pneumonias followed up in an outpatient clinic. Etiology and clinical-radiological progression].All the community acquired pneumonia followed up in an outpatient clinic were prospectively studied in order to determine: etiology, clinical-radiological characteristics and its progression with diagnostic and therapeutic protocols.We arranged clinical evaluation protocols, etiological diagnosis by means of serology (in the first visit and three weeks later); and when necessary, by means of fiberbronchoscopy (protected microbiological brush), as well as clinical and radiological progression (up to three visits) after empirical treatment.Initially, 240 patients were included, of which 221 were fully followed up. Etiological diagnosis was obtained in 86 patients (39%). The bacteria most frequently isolated was Coxiella burnetii (12.2%), followed up Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Legionella pneumophila. Two cases of Strepcococus pneumoniae were diagnosed. The most frequent radiological onset was alveolar infiltrate (86%). The initial empiric treatment were macrolids (71%) or second generation cephalosporines (22%). Most patients presented a favourable clinical and radiological progression. Only 2 patients needed admission to the hospital (< 1%).In community acquired pneumonias studied in our outpatient clinic we found a high number of "atypical" agents. Treatment with macrolids or second generation cephalosporines are appropriate for these patients.Acute respiratory tract infections in Indian children with special reference to Mycoplasma pneumoniae.A total of 70 Indian children of either sex and under 5 years of age who were admitted to the All India Institute of Medical Sciences, New Delhi during a 1-year period (January 1994-December 1994) with complaints suggestive of acute respiratory tract infections (ARTI), were investigated for bacterial aetiology of infection with special reference to Mycoplasma pneumoniae. Microbial aetiology could be established in 44/70 (62.8 per cent) of cases of ARTI. Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection was seen in 21/70 (30 per cent), aerobic bacteria in 14/70 (20 per cent), Chlamydia pneumoniae in 2/70 (2.8 per cent), and mixed infection with mycoplasma either with bacteria and/or chlamydia in 7/70 (10 per cent). However, in 26/70 (37.1 per cent) cases no cause could be detected. Diagnosis of infection with M.pneumoniae was based on culture in 2/20 (10 per cent) cases, antigen detection in throat swab by indirect immunofluorescence assay using specific antibody in 16/70 (22.8 per cent) cases, and demonstration of IgM antibody in serum by serodia Myco II particle agglutination test in 17/70 (24.2 per cent). Streptococcus pneumoniae (9/70, 12.8 per cent) and Staphylococcus aureus (5/70, 7.1 per cent) were the aerobic isolates from blood in these patients. Results of this study indicate that M.pneumoniae plays a significant role in respiratory tract infection in an Indian paediatric population. Rapid diagnostic procedures, such as antigen detection and IgM antibody demonstration, should be used more widely to determine the infective aetiology early in the course of illness. The study also highlights the mixed aetiology in ARTI in children, which has important therapeutic implications.Prevalence and clinical presentations of atypical pathogens infection in community acquired pneumonia in Thailand.To determine the prevalence of atypical pneumonia and clinical presentations in patients with community acquired pneumonia (CAP).A prospective multi-centered study was performed in patients aged > or = 2 years with the diagnosis of CAP who were treated at seven governmental hospitals in Bangkok from December 2001 to November 2002. The diagnosis of current infection was based on > or = 4 fold rise in antibody sera or persistently high antibody titers together with the presence of DNA of M. pneumoniae or C. pneumoniae in respiratory secretion or antigen of L. pneumophila in the urine. Clinical presentations were compared between patients with atypical pneumonia and unspecified pneumonia.Of 292 patients, 18.8% had current infection with atypical respiratory pathogens (M. pneumoniae 14.0%, C. pneumoniae 3.4%, L. pneumophila 0.4% and mixed infection 1.0%). Only age at presentation was significantly associated with atypical pneumonia in adults, while absence of dyspnea, lobar consolidation, and age > or = 5 years were significant findings for atypical pneumonia in children.The present study confirms the significance of atypical pathogens in adults and children. Moreover lobar consolidation is likely to predict atypical pneumonia in childhood CAP.[Contribution to the problem of sporadic acute respiratory infections (ARI) caused by RS viruses and Mycoplasma pneumoniae in preschool-age children and adults].[Clinical and epidemiological spectrum of Mycoplasma pneumoniae infections at a pediatric hospital].The objective of this study was to determine the epidemiology of Mycoplasma pneumoniae infections at our hospital and to evaluate the prescription of macrolides to empirically treat respiratory infections in children.A one year prospective study was performed. To find out the prevalence of M. pneumoniae infections, we obtained blood samples of 519 children attending our hospital out-patient department to determine M. pneumoniae IgG levels. In order to establish the incidence, IgM antibodies against M. pneumoniae were measured in 255 children admitted to the hospital showing clinical pictures compatible with this infection.In the first years of life, prevalence of M. pneumoniae infection was low. According to our study, only 3.3% of 1 year-old patients had M. pneumoniae antibodies. Antibody levels increased in children of 5 years or older. The highest rates, between 58.5% and 63.3%, were detected in patients between 8 and 12 years of age. The incidence rate (6.7%) was low among the children admitted. The most frequent clinical entity was pneumonia (82%). The highest rate of infection was found in children of 8 to 10 years. Symtomatology was mainly sub-acute. Crioagglutinins provided the most significant predictive value for etiological diagnosis.M. pneumoniae infections gain significance in patients over 5 years of age. In our environment, incidence of acute symptomatic infection is low. We consider that both age and presentation of acute respiratory processes should be taken into account when establishing empirical macrolide treatment in children.Chlamydia and Mycoplasma serology in respiratory tract infections of children.One of the challenges in planning the treatment of respiratory tract infection in children is identifying the causative agent. The objective of the present study was to investigate the incidence of Mycoplasma and Chlamydia in the etiology of respiratory tract infections of children. The present study included 100 children, three months to 12 years of age, admitted to the outpatient department of pediatrics with such respiratory symptoms as fever, cough and respiratory distress. Following a detailed clinical history and physical examination, complete blood count, erythrocyte sedimentation rate, peripheral blood smear and chest X-ray were obtained from each patient. At admission, IgG and IgM for Mycoplasma pneumoniae, Chlamydia pneumoniae, Chlamydia trachomatis and Chlamydia psittaci were determined serologically. Positive antibody titer was found for Chlamydia and Mycoplasma in 18 (18%) of the patients. It was found that 2% of the patients had acute C. pneumoniae infection. When the subjects who had infections in the past or had re-infection were also considered; 6% were infected with C. pneumoniae, 3% with C. trachomatis, 1% with C. psittaci and 8% with M. pneumoniae. The presence of eosinophilia (> or = 4%) or the presence of siblings in the house were considered as factors favoring Chlamydial infections. High antibody titers for M. pneumoniae and C. pneumoniae were found more frequently after the age of two. Patients older than two years should be evaluated carefully for antibiotic treatments against atypical agents in pediatric lower respiratory tract infections.Epidemiology and clinical features of Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection in children.Mycoplasma pneumoniae (MP) is, considered to affect rarely children less than 5 yrs of age. This study was performed to describe the epidemiology and the clinical features of MP lower respiratory tract infection (LRTI) in children, presenting to a tertiary children hospital. Eleven month-longitudinal study of LRTI due to MP, diagnosed by polymerase chain reaction (PCR) on throat swab specimen, was performed. Out of 866 children with LRTI admitted to the Gaslini Pediatric Institute in Genoa, 102 had a positive PCR for MP. We found 39 preschool-aged children, 42 school-aged children and 21 young adolescent [6.20 (3.81) yrs old]. Interestingly, eight MP+ infants had <8 months of age. The commonest presentations were cough and/or fever (76.5%). Tachypnoea, upper respiratory tract involvement, diarrhoea and vomiting were more common in the <5 yr Gr as compared to the other groups. Chest X-ray was found abnormal in 76 children: consolidations were the commonest finding. Laboratory test showed that the preschool-aged children had a higher number of lymphocytes (p<0.0001) and monocytes (p=0.009). Thrombocytosis was found in 35.7% of children and was more frequent in the preschool-aged children (p=0.013). MP infection is common in preschool-aged children, including young infants, and may have different clinical presentation, as compared to older children.Use of simple heuristics to target macrolide prescription in children with community-acquired pneumonia.Macrolides are the first-line antibiotic treatment of community-acquired pneumonia (CAP). Owing to alarming resistance rates among invasive Streptococcus pneumoniae isolates, particularly in young children, macrolide use should be restricted to patients infected with susceptible pathogens, eg, Mycoplasma pneumoniae.To develop a simple clinical prediction rule for identifying M pneumoniae as the cause of CAP in children.Prospective cohort study in 253 children with radiologically confirmed CAP in a walk-in clinic of a tertiary care hospital.Mycoplasma infection, proven by results of antibody testing of paired serum samples (gold standard). We compared the area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (c statistic) of the following 2 prediction models: a scoring system derived from logistic regression analysis and a fast-and-frugal decision tree.Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection was confirmed in 32 (13%) of 253 children. A scoring system based on duration of fever and patient age yielded a c statistic of 0.84 (95% confidence interval [CI], 0.77-0.91), compared with that of the decision tree (c = 0.76 [95% CI, 0.70-0.83]). The scoring system identified 75% of all cases as being at high or very high risk for M pneumoniae infection; the decision tree, 72% at high risk. The scoring system would curtail macrolide prescriptions by 75%; the decision tree, by 68%.In children with CAP, simple clinical decision rules identify patients at risk for M pneumoniae infection. At present US macrolide resistance rates among invasive S pneumoniae isolates, both rules increase the chance of prescribing effective first-line antibiotics compared with general macrolide administration.Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydia pneumoniae in pediatric community-acquired pneumonia: comparative efficacy and safety of clarithromycin vs. erythromycin ethylsuccinate.We evaluated 260 previously healthy children ages 3 through 12 years who had clinical signs and symptoms of pneumonia, radiographically confirmed. Patients were randomized 1:1 to a 10-day course of either clarithromycin suspension 15 mg/kg/day divided twice a day or erythromycin suspension 40 mg/kg/day divided twice a day or three times a day. Evidence of infection with Chlamydia pneumoniae was detected in 28% (74) of patients: 13% (34) by nasopharyngeal culture and 18% (48) by serology with the microimmunofluorescence assay. Evidence of infection with Mycoplasma pneumoniae was detected in 27% (69) of patients: 20% (53) by nasopharyngeal culture or polymerase chain reaction and 17% (44) by serology with the use of enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay. Serologic confirmation of infection was observed in 23% (8) and 53% (28) of patients with bacteriologically detected C. pneumoniae and M. pneumoniae, respectively. Treatment with clarithromycin vs. erythromycin, respectively, yielded the following outcomes: clinical success 98% (121 of 124) vs. 95% (105 of 110); radiologic success 98% (109 of 111) vs. 94% (92 of 110); and eradication by pathogen, C. pneumoniae 79% (15 of 19) vs. 86% (12 of 14) and M. pneumoniae 100% (9 of 9) vs. 100% (4 of 4). Adverse events were primarily gastrointestinal occurring in almost one-fourth of patients in both groups, and were mild to moderate in severity. Clarithromycin and erythromycin were similarly effective and safe for the treatment of radiographically proved, community-acquired pneumonia in children older than 2 years old.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)An Asian study on the prevalence of atypical respiratory pathogens in community-acquired pneumonia.In many parts of Asia, the inaccessibility and high cost of diagnostic tests have hampered the study of community-acquired pneumonia (CAP) caused by atypical respiratory pathogens.This surveillance study examined the frequency of infection with Mycoplasma pneumoniae, Chlamydophila pneumoniae, and Legionella pneumophila in 1756 patients presenting with signs and symptoms of CAP at 12 medical centres in Asia, using standardised laboratory techniques and interpretation criteria in all participating centres.Diagnosis of current infection was based on significant changes in antibody titer or persisting high antibody titers, together with the presence of bacterial DNA in respiratory secretions, in the case of M. pneumoniae and C. pneumoniae infections, or bacterial antigen in urine, in the case of L. pneumophila serogroup 1 infection.Using these criteria, results from 1374 patients with paired sera showed that, overall, 23.5% of CAP cases were associated with infection with atypical respiratory pathogens, with M. pneumoniae, C. pneumoniae, and L. pneumophila being found in 12.2%, 4.7%, and 6.6% of cases, respectively. Persisting high antibody titers indicative of past exposure to M. pneumoniae, C. pneumoniae, and L. pneumophila were seen in 10.2%, 4.8%, and 18.9% of patients, respectively.These data reflect the overall high prevalence of these atypical pathogens among Asian patients with CAP.Clinical characterisation of pneumonia caused by atypical pathogens combining classic and novel predictors.The aim of this study was to characterise community-acquired pneumonia (CAP) caused by atypical pathogens by combining distinctive clinical and epidemiological features and novel biological markers. A population-based prospective study of consecutive patients with CAP included investigation of biomarkers of bacterial infection, e.g., procalcitonin, C-reactive protein and lipopolysaccharide-binding protein (LBP) levels. Clinical, radiological and laboratory data for patients with CAP caused by atypical pathogens were compared by univariate and multivariate analysis with data for patients with typical pathogens and patients from whom no organisms were identified. Two predictive scoring models were developed with the most discriminatory variables from multivariate analysis. Of 493 patients, 94 had CAP caused by atypical pathogens. According to multivariate analysis, patients with atypical pneumonia were more likely to have normal white blood cell counts, have repetitive air-conditioning exposure, be aged <65 years, have elevated aspartate aminotransferase levels, have been exposed to birds, and have lower serum levels of LBP. Two different scoring systems were developed that predicted atypical pathogens with sensitivities of 35.2% and 48.8%, and specificities of 93% and 91%, respectively. The combination of selected patient characteristics and laboratory data identified up to half of the cases of atypical pneumonia with high specificity, which should help clinicians to optimise initial empirical therapy for CAP.Seroetiology of acute lower respiratory infections among hospitalized children in Beijing.Little is known of the etiology of childhood acute lower respiratory infections in China, where the use of antimicrobials is indiscriminate. Trials to change such a policy require etiologic data, especially on the bacteria most relevant to these common diseases.One hundred consecutive infants and children from 3 months to 14 years of age with symptoms and signs compatible with acute lower respiratory infections were studied prospectively in the largest pediatric hospital in Beijing from February to May, 1997. Blood culture, thorax radiography and paired sera for 20 microbiologic assays were taken, and the course of illness was monitored uniformly. Disease severity was graded.In 24 cases there was evidence only of bacterial etiology, and in 5 solely viral agents were found; 3 children probably had a mixed bacterial-viral infection. Surprisingly no pneumococcal infection was detected, Mycoplasma pneumoniae (n = 21), Haemophilus influenzae type b (n = 8) and Chlamydia pneumoniae (n = 7) being the dominant bacteria. All children recovered.Routine use of antimicrobials for these patients seems unjustified. Serologic evidence for the H. influenzae type b etiology is encouraging in terms of vaccination, but confirmatory studies are needed.Mycoplasma Pneumoniae infection in Malaysian children admitted with community acquired pneumonia.Mycoplasma pneumoniae is increasingly recognized as an important cause of community acquired pneumonia (CAP) in children. We determined the importance of M. pneumoniae as a causative agent in 170 children aged 1 month to 15 years who were hospitalized with CAP over a 6-month period. The diagnosis of M. pneumoniae infection was based on serological evidence obtained by a particle agglutination test (SERODIA-MYCO II). A positive serological diagnosis was made if the acute phase serum titer was more than 1:160 or paired samples taken 2-4 weeks apart showed a four-fold or greater rise in the serum titer. M. pneumoniae was identified as the causative agent in 40 (23.5%) children. Children with M. pneumoniae infection were more likely to be older than 3 years (OR 4.0 95%CI 1.8-9.1, p<0.001), Chinese (OR 4.3 95%CI 2.0-8.9, p<0.001), have a duration of illness longer than 7 days prior to admission (OR 6.0 95%CI 2.7-13.5, p<0.001) and have perihilar interstitial changes on chest X-ray (OR 4.6 95%CI 2.2-9.9, p<0.001). A significant number of hospital admissions for CAP in Malaysian children can be attributed to M. pneumoniae. It is important to identify these children so as to administer the most appropriate antibiotic treatment.Safety and efficacy of azithromycin in the treatment of community-acquired pneumonia in children.To compare the safety and efficacy of azithromycin with amoxicillin/clavulanate or erythromycin for the treatment of community-acquired pneumonia, including atypical pneumonia caused by Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydia pneumoniae.Multicenter, parallel group, double blind trial in which patients 6 months to 16 years of age with community-acquired pneumonia were randomized 2:1 to receive either azithromycin for 5 days or conventional therapy for 10 days (amoxicillin/clavulanate if < or =5 years of age or erythromycin estolate if >5 years of age). Patients from 23 geographically diverse sites were evaluated for clinical outcomes and/or adverse events at Days 3 to 5, Days 15 to 19 and 4 to 6 weeks posttherapy. Microbiology (culture or polymerase chain reaction) was done at baseline and Days 15 to 19 for bacteria, Chlamydia pneumoniae and Mycoplasma pneumoniae. Serology for C. pneumoniae and M. pneumoniae was done at baseline and 4 to 6 weeks posttherapy.Of 456 patients enrolled during 17 consecutive months, 420 were evaluable. Clinical success at Study Days 15 to 19 was 94.6% in the azithromycin group and 96.2% in the comparative treatment group (P = 0.735) and at 4 to 6 weeks posttherapy 90.6 and 87.1%, respectively (P = 0.330). Evidence of infection was identified in 46% of 420 evaluable patients (1.9% bacteria, 29.5% M. pneumoniae and 15% C. pneumoniae). Microbiologic eradication was 81% for C. pneumoniae and 100% for M. pneumoniae in the azithromycin group vs. 100 and 57%, respectively, in the comparator group. Treatment-related adverse events occurred in 11.3% of the azithromycin group and 31% in the comparator group (P < 0.05).Azithromycin used once daily for 5 days produced a satisfactory therapeutic outcome similar to those of amoxicillin/clavulanate or erythromycin given three times a day for 10 days for treatment of community-acquired pneumonia. Azithromycin had significantly fewer side effects than comparator drugs.Etiology and response to antibiotic therapy of community-acquired pneumonia in French children.The aim of this study was to determine the etiologic agents associated with community-acquired pneumonia in 104 French children ages 18 months to 13 years. Potential respiratory pathogens were identified in 87 (85%) cases; these included respiratory syncytial virus in ten, other viruses in 20, Streptococcus pneumoniae in 14 and Mycoplasma pneumoniae (diagnosed by serologic procedures) in 43. Of 32 patients with Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection who were initially treated with beta-lactam antibiotics, 30 failed treatment. Recovery from mycoplasma infection occurred rapidly in patients treated with macrolide antibiotics (which included spiramycin in 31 patients, josamycin in 7, and erythromycin in 3); however, cough persisted in 12 patients for one month. The high frequency of Mycoplasma pneumoniae in children over 18 months of age must be considered when selecting an antibiotic for initial therapy.[Chlamydia pneumoniae infection and Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection in pediatric patients].We evaluated a total of 1104 pediatric patients with acute lower respiratory tract infection for C. pneumoniae infection and M. pneumoniae infection by serology during July 1995 to December 1998. A microimmunofluorescence test was used for diagnosis of C. pneumoniae infection and a high density particle agglutination test for that of M. pneumoniae infection. Acute C. pneumoniae infection was found in 149 patients (13.5%), acute M. pneumoniae infection in 118 patients (10.7%), and dual infection in 27 patients (2.4%). Among 305 patients with pneumonia, M. pneumoniae infection (83 patients, 27.2%) was more common than C. pneumoniae infection (47 patients, 15.4%). However among 799 patients with bronchitis. C. pneumoniae infection (102 patients, 12.8%) was more common than M. pneumoniae infection (35 patients, 4.4%). Patients with C. pneumoniae infection were more younger and more frequently wheezing than patients with M. pneumoniae infection. These findings demonstrate that C. pneumoniae infection in very common pathogen of pediatric lower respiratory tract infection as M. pneumoniae infection in Japan.Aetiology and resistance patterns of community-acquired pneumonia in Len, Nicaragua.We conducted a prevalence study to gain greater insight into the aetiology, bacterial resistance and risk factors for community-acquired pneumonia (CAP) in the region of Len, Nicaragua. During the period from July 2002 to January 2005, all consecutive patients with signs and symptoms suggestive of CAP were included in the study. Sputum samples, paired serum samples and urinary samples were collected for the detection of respiratory pathogens. The most frequently identified pathogens were Streptococcus pneumoniae (17%), followed by Staphylococcus aureus (5%), Chlamydia pneumoniae (5%) and Mycoplasma pneumoniae (4%). Pseudomonas aeruginosa was cultured from 5% of patients. No pathogens were identified in 55%. All tested S. pneumoniae were sensitive to erythromycin and penicillin. In contrast, resistance of S. aureus to penicillin and erythromycin was high.Mycoplasma pneumoniae infections in a rural setting in Canada.Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection was monitored in patients with symptoms of acute respiratory tract infection in a village in southeastern Ontario from April 1983 to April 1984. M. pneumoniae was isolated from 51 (48%) of the 106 patients. The incidence began to increase in May 1983, reached a peak in July and declined to normal by mid-August. During the epidemic period M. pneumoniae was detected in 36 of the 43 symptomatic patients. The most prominent features of the outbreak were the considerable intrafamilial attack rate and the high frequency of pneumonia among infected patients. Treatment with tetracyclines and erythromycin reduced the duration of the illness and accelerated the resolution of symptoms.Prevalence of Mycoplasma pneumoniae-associated respiratory tract infections in hospitalized children: results of a 4-year prospective study in Tunis.Specific microbiologic, molecular, and serologic assays are hardly available in Tunis to confirm a suspected infection of Mycoplasma pneumoniae (MP). These diagnosis methods were used for the first time in a Tunisian prospective study to estimate the prevalence of MP infection in children and to evaluate their usefulness for diagnosis. A total of 540 children hospitalized in Tunis for lower respiratory tract infections (LRTIs) between 2005 and 2009 and 580 clinical specimens were investigated for the presence of MP by culture and by end-point polymerase chain reaction (PCR) targeting the P1 and the 16S rRNA genes. Real-time PCR was also used for MP detection on 158 respiratory samples. A total of 525 serum samples were tested for detection of MP-specific IgM and IgG. The P1 adhesin type and the antibiotic susceptibility testing were determined for the 9 clinical strains isolated during the study period. MP was detected in 33 (5.7%) clinical samples. Specific MP seropositivity was confirmed in 54 serum samples (10.3%), among which 19 (3.6%) were indicative of acute MP infection. MP infection was confirmed in 39 (7.2%) patients: 24 positive by PCR and/or culture, 10 serologically positive only, and 5 confirmed positive by both methods. MP infections occurred throughout the year with a slight decrease in autumn. The 9 MP isolates were susceptible to erythromycin, tetracycline, and ciprofloxacin, and all belonged to type I. The prevalence of MP infection in children with LRTI was 7.2% between 2005 and 2009, in Tunisia. Combination of direct detection and serology was required to enhance the clinical sensitivity of MP detection in clinical specimens.Detection of Mycoplasma pneumoniae in children with lower respiratory tract infections.Mycoplasma pneumoniae is known to be a major cause of lower respiratory tract infections (LRTIs) in children. We studied 75 children who had been hospitalized for community-acquired LRTIs for the detection of M. pneumoniae by serological analysis and polymerase chain reaction (PCR) to amplify a 277-base pair region of 16S rDNA gene of M. pneumoniae applied to throat swab specimens. Serological and/or PCR positive results diagnosed M. pneumoniae infection in 23 (30.7%) patients.Isolation of Mycoplasma pneumoniae from children with lower-respiratory-tract infections.The prevalence and clinical pictures of Mycoplasma pneumoniae infections among children were studied using culture and serological techniques. The isolation rate was 22% (195 of 885) in pneumonic patients and 11% (66 of 600) in non-pneumonic patients. In patients three years of age or less, M. pneumoniae was isolated at the same rate from febrile and afebrile cases and from wheezy and non-wheezy cases. In older patients, however, M. pneumoniae was frequently isolated from febrile but non-wheezy cases. A peak in the number of the positive isolates was found in patients who were four years old. The peak number of M. pneumoniae infections at age four was confirmed serologically. This peak was in patients who were younger than those previously reported.Clinical, radiographic and hematological characteristics of Mycoplasma pneumoniae pneumonia.To describe the clinical, hematological and radiographic characteristics of children hospitalized for Mycoplasma pneumoniae pneumonia.The study population consisted of 190 children between 3 months and 16 years old, hospitalized for radiographically confirmed pneumonia. Patients were divided into two groups, to wit: 95 children with Mycoplasma pneumoniae pneumonia, as diagnosed using the enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) method; and 95 children with pneumonia caused by other etiologic agents. Using a validated scoring system, the clinical, hematological and radiographic findings of both groups were compared to differentiate Mycoplasma pneumoniae pneumonia (group 1) from pneumonia caused by other etiologic agents (group 2), itself divided into two groups, bacterial (n = 75) and viral (n = 20).Mycoplasma pneumoniae pneumonia was found most often in girls (p < 0.01), older children (p < 0.01), and patients with dry cough (p < 0.01) and extrapulmonary manifestations (p < 0.01). The clinical, hematological and radiographic variables of Mycoplasma pneumoniae pneumonia (mean score = 6.95) scored between those found in bacterial (mean score = 8.27) and viral pneumonia (mean score = 0.90).Results suggest that the scoring system can contribute to the presumptive diagnosis of Mycoplasma pneumoniae pneumonia and help differentiate pneumonic status caused by other etiologic agents.[Epidemiology and morbidity of mycoplasma as causative agent for community-acquired pneumonia in hospitalized children in a Community Hospital in Vienna].Epidemiology and morbidity of mycoplasma-associated pneumonia in youths and children in Vienna are not known. The first objective was to elucidate the incidence and the second was to evaluate a standard antibiotic regimen with addition of a macrolid in children over 5 years.Hospitalized patients were evaluated prospectively during 3 winter seasons. In a clinical routine setting microbiologic tests were performed, nasal secretions were tested for viruses, Chlamydia pneumoniae and Mycoplasma pneumoniae, and clinical parameters were documented.Mycoplasma pneumoniae was identified in 12 patients out of 279 (4.3%). All were 5 years and older. The mean number of days in hospital was 4.6, the number of days with fever > 38.5 degrees was 1.2, the maximal value of C-reactive protein was 48 mg/L, no complications occurred, and all children recovered completely.Mycoplasma pneumoniae was identified in 4.3% of children and youths. The antibiotic regimen is appropriate as initial therapy.Role of Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydia pneumoniae in children with community-acquired lower respiratory tract infections.In order to evaluate the role of Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydia pneumoniae, we studied 613 children aged 2-14 years who were hospitalized for community-acquired lower respiratory tract infections (LRTIs). The patients were enrolled in the study by 21 centers in different regions of Italy from May 1998 through April 1999. Paired serum samples were obtained on admission and after 4-6 weeks to assay the titers of M. pneumoniae and C. pneumoniae antibodies. Nasopharyngeal aspirates for the detection of M. pneumoniae and C. pneumoniae were obtained on admission. Acute M. pneumoniae infections in 210 patients (34.3%) and acute C. pneumoniae infections in 87 (14.1%) were diagnosed. Fifteen of the 18 children with M. pneumoniae and/or C. pneumoniae infections whose treatments were considered clinical failures 4-6 weeks after enrollment had not been treated with macrolides. Our study confirms that M. pneumoniae and/or C. pneumoniae plays a significant role in community-acquired LRTIs in children of all ages and that such infections have a more complicated course when not treated with adequate antimicrobial agents.Rapid optimization of antimicrobial chemotherapy given to pediatric patients with community-acquired pneumonia using PCR techniques with serology and standard culture.Children (n = 117; mean age 2.4 +/- 2.9 years) were diagnosed as having community-acquired pneumonia (CAP) using clinical symptoms, chest X-rays, and hematological data. The causative pathogen was determined using real-time polymerase chain reaction (PCR) (6 bacteria), multiple reverse transcription-PCR (MPCR; 11 viruses), bacterial culture, and serology. The initial chemotherapy was evaluated based on the pathogens identified using PCR. We found 27 viral cases (23.1%), 25 bacterial cases (21.4%), 45 mixed infections with virus and bacteria (38.5%), 10 Mycoplasma pneumoniae (8.5%), 7 mixed infections with M. pneumoniae and another pathogen (6.0%), 1 Chlamydophila pneumoniae (0.9%), and 2 unknown pathogens (1.7%). Streptococcus pneumoniae and Haemophilus influenzae accounted for 58 (49.5%) and 27 (23.0%) of the cases, respectively. The median values (50%) of the white blood cell count (WBC) and C-reactive protein (CRP) using the box-and-whisker and plot method, respectively, were 11.7 x 10(3) mm(-3) and 1.4 mg/dl in viral infections, 15.6 x 10(3) mm(-3) and 4.8 mg/dl in mixed infections with virus and bacteria, 17.8 x 10(3) mm(-3) and 6.3 mg/dl in bacterial infections, 6.7 x 10(3) mm(-3) and 1.4 mg/dl in M. pneumoniae infections, and 21.5 x 10(3) mm(-3) and 6.4 mg/dl in mixed infections with M. pneumoniae and other bacterial infections. Sulbactam/ampicillin (n = 61), carbapenems (n = 12), and ceftriaxone (n = 7) were selected for the patients suspected of having bacterial infections alone or mixed infections with bacterial and viruses in accordance with our criteria defined tentatively. For those with M. pneumoniae and C. pneumoniae infections, azithromycin or minocycline was initially used. Treatments averaged 3-5 days. The empirical chemotherapy was improper in 9.4% of cases in relation to the etiologic agents finally identified. We conclude that rapid and comprehensive identification using PCR can provide optimal antimicrobial chemotherapy for CAP patients.Role of Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydia pneumoniae in children with community-acquired pneumonia in Istanbul, Turkey.To investigate the role of Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydia pneumoniae infection in pediatric pneumonia, in Istanbul, Turkey, we conducted a prospective study covering all the children between 2 months and 15 years hospitalized for community-acquired pneumonia.A total of 140 children (85 males, median age 2.5 years) with community-acquired pneumonia were enrolled. Acute and convalescent sera were tested for IgM and IgG antibodies to M. pneumoniae (enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay, Serion ELISA classic) and for IgM and IgG antibodies to C. pneumoniae (microimmunofluorescence, Savyon, Israel).Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection was diagnosed in 38 patients (27%) and C. pneumoniae infection in 7 (5%). In 2 children M. pneumoniae and C. pneumoniae co infection was observed. The average age of the M. pneumoniae cases was 5.3 years and that of the C. pneumoniae was 1.5 years. The average age of pneumonia cases caused by other pathogens was 3.4 years (p<0.05). No significant difference was observed in clinical onset, signs, symptoms and laboratory parameters in children with M. pneumoniae and C. pneumoniae infection and in those without M. pneumoniae and C. pneumoniae infection.The results of this study suggest a remarkable role for M. pneumoniae and C. pneumoniae in childhood community-acquired pneumonia, and the knowledge of the true prevalence of these two types of infections discovered in the community might lead to modifications in the present empirical treatment of bacterial pneumonia.Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydia pneumoniae infections in children with pneumonia. Mowgli Study Group.The most common clinical signs, host responses and radiographic patterns were studied in 203 Italian children hospitalized for community-acquired pneumonia in order to clarify the role of clinical and radiological characteristics in the diagnosis of Mycoplasma pneumoniae and/or Chlamydia pneumoniae infections. Antibody measurements in paired sera and polymerase chain reaction on nasopharyngeal aspirates were used to establish the diagnoses of acute M. pneumoniae and C. pneumoniae infection, and the aetiologic data were correlated with the clinical, laboratory and radiographic data obtained on admission. No significant association was observed between evidence of M. pneumoniae and/or C. pneumoniae infection and periods of episode during the year, mean age of the study subjects, individual symptoms, physical findings or laboratory test results. Furthermore, no significant correlation was observed in relation to the radiological findings and M. pneumoniae and/or C. pneumoniae infection. This study shows that neither clinical findings nor laboratory parameters distinguished Mycoplasma pneumoniae and/or Chlamydia pneumoniae infection in children with pneumonia. Radiological findings also have a limited capacity to differentiate aetiologic agents. The priorities for future research include the development of rapid, easily accessible and cost-effective diagnostic tests useful for each episode of pneumonia in children.Frequency of Chlamydia pneumoniae and Mycoplasma pneumoniae infections in children.Chlamydia pneumoniae and Mycoplasma pneumoniae are among the most important pathogens of acute respiratory infections in children between the ages of 5 and 15 years. We aimed to investigate seasonal frequency of respiratory infections caused by C. pneumoniae and M. pneumoniae, frequency of coinfection, clinical findings and to determine relationship between clinical findings and laboratory results.Total of 284 patients (ranging 5-15 years of age), admitted to out-patient clinic with symptoms of respiratory tract infections between January 2004 and June 2005, were enrolled in the study. IgA, IgG and IgM antibodies against C. pneumoniae were quantitatively detected in all serum samples by using microimmunofluorescence (MIF). For the M. pneumoniae infection an IgM titer in the ELISA test were analyzed. Nasopharyngeal smear samples were collected for PCR detection.Mean age was 8 +/- 2.2 (range 5-14) years. Mycoplasma pneumoniae IgM in 86 (30.2%) cases, C. pneumoniae IgM in one (0.3%) case, IgA in six (2.1%) cases and IgG in 10 (3.5%) cases were found positive. In 10 (3.5%) cases, both C. pneumoniae IgG (a titer of >1/216) and M. pneumoniae IgM were found positive concomitantly. The M. pneumoniae IgM in winter was found significantly higher compared to other seasons. Mycoplasma pneumoniae PCR method was performed on a total of 203 samples in 33 (16.2%) of which M. pneumoniae was found positive. The false positive ratio of PCR technique was found 16.2%. In a total of 217 examined samples by PCR method, the DNA of C. pneumoniae was found positive in two patients.Mycoplasma pneumoniae was a common pathogen in respiratory infections. The otherwise C. pneumoniae infections were rarely seen in children. A Comparison of serology diagnostic tests for M. pneumoniae infections was found more sensitive and specific than PCR.Comparative randomized trial of azithromycin versus erythromycin and amoxicillin for treatment of community-acquired pneumonia in children.Our objective was to compare the clinical efficacy of azithromycin vs. erythromycin and amoxicillin in the treatment of presumed bacterial community-acquired pneumonia in ambulatory children, and to evaluate the etiologies of these illnesses. One hundred and ten children, aged 1 month to 14 years, were enrolled between January 1996-January 1999. Children were distributed into two groups according to clinical and radiological patterns: classic or atypical pneumonia. Patients with classic pneumonia were randomly assigned to receive oral amoxicillin 75 mg/kg/day for 7 days, or azithromycin 10 mg/kg/day for 3 days; patients with atypical pneumonia received azithromycin 10 mg/kg/day for 3 days, or erythromycin 50 mg/kg/day for 14 days. Chest X-ray, clinical, and laboratory parameters were obtained on enrollment. Clinic visits were performed on days 3, 7, and 14, and chest X-ray follow-up on days 7 and 14. Microbiological diagnosis of classic pathogens was based on blood and bronchial secretion cultures. The diagnosis of atypical pathogens C. pneumoniae, C. trachomatis, and M. pneumoniae was based on PCR and serologic tests.Forty-seven children met the criteria for classic pneumonia (23 children received azithromycin, and 24 received amoxicillin), and 59 children had atypical pneumonia (33 children were treated with azithromycin, and 26 with erythromycin). Demographic characteristics at enrollment were similar between children with classic pneumonia treated with azithromycin and erythromycin and children treated with azithromycin and erythromycin for atypical pneumonia. However, on day 7, children with classic pneumonia who received azithromycin normalized their chest X-ray more often than those who received amoxicillin (81.0% vs. 60.9%, respectively, P = 0.009). The same was true for children with atypical pneumonia; their chest X-rays had normalized by day 14 (100% in those with azithromycin vs. 81% in those with erythromycin, P = 0.059). Also, children with atypical pneumonia treated with azithromycin had earlier cessation of cough than children treated with erythromycin (3.6 +/- 1.9 vs. 5.5 +/- 3.6 days respectively, P = 0.02). There were only three children with side effects (mild diarrhea, all in the erythromycin group). Etiological agents were identified in 41% of children. In conclusion, azithromycin is an effective therapeutic option for the treatment of community-acquired classic and atypical pneumonia in children.Mycoplasma pneumonia in young children, 2-5 years of age.Mycoplasma pneumoniae is one of the most common causes of childhood community-acquired pneumonia (CAP), particularly in school-age children. Information regarding this infection in pre-school age children is lacking.To determine the prevalence of M. pneumoniae in young children aged under 5 years with CAP.This prospective study was conducted at Queen Sirikit National Institute of Child Health (QSNICH), Bangkok, Thailand between December 2001 and November 2002. We enrolled children aged 2 to 5 years with a clinical and radiological diagnosis of CAP. Acute and convalescent sera were collected and measured by using a particle agglutination test. Polymerase chain reaction (PCR) assay for M. pneumoniae was detected from nasopharyngeal secretions. Criteria for diagnosis were defined as > or = 4-found rising of mycoplasma antibody or titer > or = 1:160 with positive PCR.Thirteen out of 113 CAP patients were diagnosed as mycoplasma pneumonia. Three of them were diagnosed by > or = 4-fold rising of mycoplasma antibody while another 10 patients were diagnosed by mycoplasma titer > or = 1:160 with positive PCR for M. pneumoniae. Clinical symptoms and signs of these 13 mycoplasma pneumonia in young patients were fever (85%), cough (92%), dyspnea (85%), diarrhea (15%), rales (85%), wheezing or rhonchi (46%), and skin rash (15%). Leucocytosis (wbc > 15,000/cumm) was found in 46%. Chest x-rays revealed interstitial infiltration (71%), patchy infiltration (29%) and no pleural effusion was detected. Choices of antibiotic were erythromycin (31%), beta lactam antibiotics (61%), and antibiotic was not prescribed in one patient (8%). Sixty-nine percent of the patients improved, while 31% did not, possibly due to the use of beta lactam antibiotics, or non use of antibiotics.Mycopalsma pneumonia is not uncommon in children aged 2-5 years with CAP. Clinical signs, symptoms and radiological findings are non-specific and cannot be differentiated from other causes of CAP.Prevalence of Mycoplasma and Chlamydia pneumonia in severe community-acquired pneumonia among hospitalized children in Thailand.Pneumonia is the leading cause of pediatric morbidity and mortality worldwide, and Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydia pneumoniae are the two most common atypical pathogens. This study was designed to determine the prevalence and clinical impact of mycoplasma and chlamydia pneumonia in children hospitalized with severe pneumonia. Children 1 month-15 years old with a diagnosis of severe pneumonia (WHO criteria) were recruited between March 2005 and March 2006. Serologic studies were performed for anti-M. pneumoniae and anti-C. pneumoniae IgG/M on admission and 2-4 weeks afterward using ELISA. Of 52 patients, 13 (25%) were positive for Mycoplasma, 8 (15%) were positive for Chlamydia, 4 (7.6%) were positive for a mixed infection and 27 (52%) were negative. The subjects' mean age was 23.8+/-4.1 months. The mean of initial oxygen saturation on admission was 87.5+/-1.2%. Fever and prolonged cough were the leading symptoms. The mean of hospitalization was 18.8+/-2.6 days, chlamydia pneumonia had the longest duration, 30+/-10.2 days and 13/52 (25%) study subjects developed respiratory failure. Only 10% were treated with adequate antibiotic prior to serologic results. There was one mortality (1/52, 2%). Our study suggests that mycoplasma and chlamydia infections are commonly found among children hospitalized with severe pneumonia. Coverage with an appropriate antibiotic should be considered to hasten recovery.Epidemiology and clinical characteristics of community-acquired pneumonia in hospitalized children.The precise epidemiology of childhood pneumonia remains poorly defined. Accurate and prompt etiologic diagnosis is limited by inadequate clinical, radiologic, and laboratory diagnostic methods. The objective of this study was to determine as precisely as possible the epidemiology and morbidity of community-acquired pneumonia in hospitalized children.Consecutive immunocompetent children hospitalized with radiographically confirmed lower respiratory infections (LRIs) were evaluated prospectively from January 1999 through March 2000. Positive blood or pleural fluid cultures or pneumolysin-based polymerase chain reaction assays, viral direct fluorescent antibody tests, or viral, mycoplasmal, or chlamydial serologic tests were considered indicative of infection by those organisms. Methods for diagnosis of pneumococcal pneumonia among study subjects were published by us previously. Selected clinical characteristics, indices of inflammation (white blood cell and differential counts and procalcitonin values), and clinical outcome measures (time to defervescence and duration of oxygen supplementation and hospitalization) were compared among groups of children.One hundred fifty-four hospitalized children with LRIs were enrolled. Median age was 33 months (range: 2 months to 17 years). A pathogen was identified in 79% of children. Typical respiratory bacteria were identified in 60% (of which 73% were Streptococcus pneumoniae), viruses in 45%, Mycoplasma pneumoniae in 14%, Chlamydia pneumoniae in 9%, and mixed bacterial/viral infections in 23%. Preschool-aged children had as many episodes of atypical bacterial LRIs as older children. Children with typical bacterial or mixed bacterial/viral infections had the greatest inflammation and disease severity. Multivariate logistic-regression analyses revealed that high temperature (> or = 38.4 degrees C) within 72 hours after admission (odds ratio: 2.2; 95% confidence interval: 1.4-3.5) and the presence of pleural effusion (odds ratio: 6.6; 95% confidence interval: 2.1-21.2) were significantly associated with bacterial pneumonia.This study used an expanded diagnostic armamentarium to define the broad spectrum of pathogens that cause pneumonia in hospitalized children. The data confirm the importance of S pneumoniae and the frequent occurrence of bacterial and viral coinfections in children with pneumonia. These findings will facilitate age-appropriate antibiotic selection and future evaluation of the clinical effectiveness of the pneumococcal conjugate vaccine as well as other candidate vaccines.High prevalence of Mycoplasma pneumoniae in patients with respiratory tract symptoms: a rapid detection method.Serodiagnosis of acute respiratory infections in children in Georgia.To investigate the etiology of acute respiratory infections in hospitalized children.A total of 808 children were studied. Investigation of RSV, Adenovirus, Parainfluenza, Influenza A and B, C.trachomatis, C.pneumoniae, M. pneumonia and Legionella were performed with an ELISA for IgM, IgG and IgA antibodies detection.There were 496 males and 312 females giving a male: female ratio of 1.6:1. Ages range from 1 month to 15 years. The overall detection rate was 57.9%. The most frequently detected were: parainfluenza 12.6%, adenovirus 11.2%, influenza A 7.3%, RSV 6%, M. pneumoniae 5.4%, C.trachomatis 3.5% and mixed-infections 9.2%. Pneumonia was associated most frequently with adenovirus and mixed-infections; wheezing bronchitis--with adenovirus, RSV and M. pneumoniae; bronchitis--with parainfluenza and adenovirus, diseases of upper respiratory tract--with parainfluenza and adenovirus. Peak of the virus activity was during winter (influenza, parainfluenza, adenovirus, RSV) and autumn (parainfluenza, RSV).Viruses are the main causes of ARI in Georgian children. A better understanding of the etiology of ARI in all of the regions of the world may be helpful for timely decision of specific therapy, which can help pediatricians to estimate and manage children with ARI.Community-acquired pneumonia in children in Lambarene, Gabon.Community-acquired pneumonia (CAP) accounts for more than two million deaths per year in children < 5 years of age. Recognition of pathogens is vital for guiding antibiotic treatment. In Gabon, no epidemiologic data on childhood CAP were available to help guide antibiotic therapy. We conducted a prospective, hospital-based, cross-sectional survey at the Albert Schweitzer Hospital, Lambarene, Gabon, to assess the importance of atypical organisms (Chlamydia pneumoniae, Mycoplasma pneumoniae, Bordetella pertussis, and Legionella pneumophila) and Streptococcus pneumoniae in the etiology of CAP in children by means of real-time polymerase chain reaction, cell culture, and serology. Collectively, atypical bacteria accounted for 11% of cases with a special emphasis on B. pertussis, accounting for 6% of cases. Clinical differentiation of atypical from typical pneumonia in children remains challenging. Molecular diagnostic methods offer fast and highly sensitive diagnostic tools and would be able to help guide antimicrobial therapy in rural areas where follow-up is difficult.Etiology of community-acquired pneumonia in hospitalized school-age children: evidence for high prevalence of viral infections.Community-acquired pneumonia (CAP) in young children is most commonly associated with viral infections; however, the role of viruses in CAP of school-age children is still inconclusive.Seventy-five school-age children hospitalized with CAP were prospectively evaluated for the presence of viral and bacterial pathogens. Nasopharyngeal washes were examined by polymerase chain reaction for viruses and atypical bacteria. Antibody assays to detect bacterial pathogens in acute-phase and convalescent-phase serum samples were also performed.A viral infection was identified in 65% of cases. Rhinovirus RNA was detected in 45% of patients; infection with another virus occurred in 31%. The most common bacterial pathogen was Mycoplasma pneumoniae, which was diagnosed in 35% of cases. Chlamydia pneumoniae DNA was not detected in any patient; results of serological tests were positive in only 2 patients (3%). Mixed infections were documented in 35% of patients, and the majority were a viral-bacterial combination.The high prevalence of viral and mixed viral-bacterial infections supports the notion that the presence of a virus, acting either as a direct or an indirect pathogen, may be the rule rather than the exception in the development of CAP in school-age children requiring hospitalization.Incidence of community-acquired pneumonia in children caused by Mycoplasma pneumoniae: serological results of a prospective, population-based study in primary health care.The objective of the present study was to assess the incidence of community-acquired pneumonia (CAP) in children caused by Mycoplasma pneumoniae.During 12 months in 1981-1982, all CAP cases in a defined child population were registered. M. pneumoniae aetiology, initially measured by complement fixation (CF) test, was in 1999 supplemented by measurement of IgG and IgM antibodies using enzyme immunoassays (EIA).M. pneumoniae was detected in 61 (30%) of 201 paediatric CAP cases, being the most common aetiological agent in those 5 years of age or over. At that age, M. pneumoniae was responsible for over 50% of cases, and over 90% of mycoplasmal cases were treated as outpatients. The EIA detected 17 new cases over and above the 44 detected by CF, while CF alone revealed 10 cases. The incidence of M. pneumoniae CAP increased with age, being over 10/1000 children at the age of 10 years or more. Co-infections with Streptococcus pneumoniae and Chlamydia pneumoniae were present in over 30% and 15%, respectively, of mycoplasmal CAP cases.M. pneumoniae is a common cause of paediatric CAP in primary health care, and co-infections with S. pneumoniae are common. Both S. pneumoniae and M. pneumoniae should be taken into account when starting antibiotics for children with CAP.Community acquired pneumonia--a prospective UK study.There are few data on paediatric community acquired pneumonia (PCAP) in the UK.To investigate the aetiology and most useful diagnostic tests for PCAP in the north east of England.A prospective study of hospital admissions with a diagnosis of PCAP.A pathogen was isolated from 60% (81/136) of cases, and considered a definite or probable cause of their pneumonia in 51% (70/136). Fifty (37%) had a virus implicated (65% respiratory syncytial virus) and 19 (14%) a bacterium (7% group A streptococcus, 4% Streptococcus pneumoniae), with one mixed infection. Of a subgroup (51 patients) in whom serum antipneumolysin antibody testing was performed, 6% had evidence of pneumococcal infection, and all were under 2 years old. The best diagnostic yield was from paired serology (34%, 31/87), followed by viral immunofluorescence (33%, 32/98).Viral infection accounted for 71% of the cases diagnosed. Group A streptococcus was the most common bacterial infective agent, with a low incidence of both Mycoplasma pneumoniae and S pneumoniae. Pneumococcal pneumonia was the most common bacterial cause of pneumonia in children under 2 years but not in older children. Inflammatory markers and chest x ray features did not differentiate viral from bacterial pneumonia; serology and viral immunofluorescence were the most useful diagnostic tests.Prospective surveillance for atypical pathogens in children with community-acquired pneumonia in Japan.A total of 141 children with community-acquired pneumonia (CAP) were studied prospectively to determine the causative microorganisms. Microbial investigations included examination of postnasal swabs, cultures, polymerase chain reaction (PCR), and serology. The atypical pathogens occurring most frequently were Mycoplasma pneumoniae (58 patients [41.1%]), Chlamydia pneumoniae (4 patients [2.8%]), and concurrent occurrence of both pathogens (1 patient [0.7%]). Patients aged under 4 years showed a relatively lower rate of atypical bacterial etiology compared with those aged 4 years or older. Major bacterial pathogens were detected in 89 patients (atypical pathogens were detected in 28 patients simultaneously), including Streptococcus pneumoniae in 34 patients, Haemophilus influenzae in 60, Moraxella catarrhalis in 48, and multiple pathogens in 42. In patients suspected of having atypical pneumonia, macrolides are recommended.Acute lower respiratory tract infections in hospitalized patients with diarrhea in Dhaka, Bangladesh.This study focused on 401 children less than 5 years old who were hospitalized with acute lower respiratory tract infection (ALRI) and diarrhea in Dhaka, Bangladesh, and who were investigated for the presence of both bacterial and viral respiratory tract pathogens as well as for selected diarrheal pathogens. The most common manifestations of ALRI were pneumonia (374 cases), bronchiolitis (12 cases), and tracheobronchitis (11 cases). The majority (77%) of the illnesses were in children less than 2 years of age, and 88% of the children were malnourished. A respiratory tract pathogen was identified in 30% of the patients, and a diarrheal pathogen was identified in 34%. The overall case-fatality rate in children with ALRI and diarrhea was 8%. The case-fatality rate was 14% in children with bacterial pneumonia and diarrhea, 3% in those with viral pneumonia and diarrhea, and 14% in malnourished children with shigellosis and ALRI. The most common respiratory tract pathogens were respiratory syncytial virus, Streptococcus pneumoniae, influenza viruses, and Haemophilus influenzae type b.Prevalence and clinical features of mycoplasma pneumoniae in Thai children.To determine the prevalence and clinical features of mycoplasma pneumoniae in Thai children with community acquired pneumonia (CAP).Diagnosis of current infection was based on > or = 4 fold rise in antibody sera or persistently high antibody titers together with the presence of mycoplasma DNA in respiratory secretion. The clinical features were compared between children who tested positive for M pneumoniae, and those whose results were negative.Current infection due to M. pneumoniae was diagnosed in 36 (15%) of 245 children with paired sera. The sensitivity and specificity of polymerase chain reaction (PCR) in diagnosing current infection in the present study were 78% and 98% respectively. The mean age of children with mycoplasma pneumoniae was higher than CAP with unspecified etiology. The presenting manifestations and initial laboratory finding were insufficient to predict mycoplasma pneumoniae precisely, the presence of chest pain and lobar consolidation on chest X-ray, however, were significant findings in children with mycoplasma pneumoniae.The present study confirms that M. pneumoniae plays a significant role in CAP in children of all ages. Children with this infection should be identified in order to administer the appropriate antibiotic treatment.Clinical comparative study of azithromycin versus erythromycin in the treatment of acute respiratory tract infections in children.The efficacy and tolerability of azithromycin and erythromycin in the treatment of acute respiratory tract infections in children were compared in an open, multicenter, randomized trial. A total of 151 children, aged from 2 months to 14 years, suffering from upper airways infections (60), or lower respiratory tract infections (91), were randomized to be treated either with azithromycin, 10 mg/Kg/day per os once daily for 3 or 10 mg/Kg/day 1 and 5 mg/Kg/days 2-5 (77 patients) or with erythromycin, 50 mg/Kg/day thrice daily for at least 7 days (74 patients). The two treatment groups did not significantly differ as to sex, age, weight, type and severity of infection, and infecting pathogens. Clinical evaluation was performed prior to therapy, on treatment days 1, 3, 5 and 7, and on day 10. Microbiological and laboratory assessment were carried out at baseline and after the end of therapeutic course. Chest X-ray and serologic assays for Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection were obtained in patients suspected to have lower respiratory tract infections. At the end of therapy, clinical cure was achieved in 73 out of 77 patients (94.8%) in the azithromycin group, and in 60/72 evaluable subjects (83.3%) in the erythromycin group. A significantly more rapid remission of several illness-related signs and symptoms was observed in patients treated with azithromycin. A total of 75 bacterial pathogens were isolated at baseline microbiological examination; at the end of the therapeutic course bacteriological eradication was obtained in 34/34 cases (100%) treated with azithromycin, and in 40/41 children (97.5%) treated with erythromycin.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)[Community acquired pneumonia in children].Community acquired pneumonia is responsible for a high morbidity in children. The etiological diagnosis is not always easy and treatment remains probabilistic.To analysis clinical patterns and the outcome of community acquired pneumonia and to find arguments in favour of its origin.A prospective analysis of the files of 39 children (20 boys, 19 girls) hospitalized between (1 december 2004 - 30 june 2005) for community acquired pneumonia was performed. Included dchildren whad between 6 months and 15 years-old.The mean age was of 3 years and three months. Germ was identified in 41% of cases: Mycoplasma pneumoniae was the most important germ found in 9 cases, pneumococcus was found in 4 cases and hemophilus in four cases. Coinfection pneumococcus and mycoplasma were found in two cases. None virus was identified. We have separated two groups: bacterial pneumonia and pneumoniae without definite etiology. Fat cough was associated to bacterial pneumonia. mycoplama pneumoniae was significantly associated with high fever and dry cough. We haven't found any others associations between clinical, biological or radiological patterns and the two groups of pneumonia. C-reactive protein more than 66 mg/l has sensitivity of 77%, specificity of 73.3%, positive predictive value of 46.7% of and negative predictive value of 91.7%. The outcome was favourable in all cases.Theses results showed the necessity to improve our microbiological methods to identify infectious agents of pneumonia. Mycoplasma pneumonia seems to be a frequent germ in preschool children.Mycoplasma pneumoniae in children with pneumonia at Mbagathi District Hospital, Nairobi.To determine the prevalence of mycoplasma pneumoniae in nasopharyngeal aspirates of children under five years of age suffering from pneumonia.Cross-sectional survey.Two primer sets targeting the genes coding for adhesion protein and 16S rRNA were used in PCR and M. pneumoniae specific antibodies were detected using commercial article agglutination kit. Microbiological investigations to isolate common acute respiratory infectious pathogens were also carried out.M. pneumoniae was detected in nasopharyngeal aspirates of 33.7% of the cases by PCR while serology was positive in only 4.1%. M. pneumoniae alone (single detection) was detected in 25% of the cases while 75% occurred with other acute respiratory infectious (ARI) pathogens. However, the results did not correlate with clinical outcome or the severity of pneumonia. No significant aetiology was found in 28% of the cases investigated, however microbiological investigations by culture revealed the presence of other aetiological agents as follows: Streptococcus pneumoniae (26%), Klebsiella pneumoniae (1%), Staphylococcus aureus (3%), E. coli (2%), parainfluenza viruses (5%), Salmonella(1%), adenovirus (4%), RSV (22%) and Candida spp(13%), Mycoplasma pneumoniae was more prevalent in children aged between six months and three years. Cases of M. pneumoniae PCR positive and S. pneumoniae exhibited similar seasonal distribution with peaks in May and September. However, there was no relationship between M. pneumoniae PCR positive and the severity of pneumonia.More investigation is required to establish the significance of atypical pathogens in respiratory infections in Kenya.Serological study of acute respiratory tract infection in children with reference to Mycoplasma pneumoniae complement fixing and cold hemagglutinating antibodies.Prevalence of Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydia pneumoniae in children with community acquired pneumonia.A prospective one year study was performed on 62 children admitted at the All India Institute of Medical Sciences with community acquired pneumonia (CAP) for the prevalence of Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydia pneumoniae. Diagnosis of infection with M. pneumoniae was based on serological tests viz microparticle agglutination test for detection of IgM antibodies and indirect immunofluorescence test for antigen detection from throat swabs (sensitivity 85.7%, specificity 93.3%). The indirect solid-phase enzyme immunoassay for detection of IgG antibodies was used to determine the prevalence of C. pneumoniae (sensitivity 88.8%, specificity 75.8%). Seventeen patients (27.4%) were found to have serological evidence of M. pneumoniae infection whereas only 4 (6.4%) patients were seropositive for C. pneumoniae. Results of this study indicate that M. Pneumoniae plays a significant role in CAP in infants and young children. Thus specialized laboratory testing for these agents should be more widely used thereby affecting empiric antibiotic regimens.An explosive outbreak of Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection in a summer camp.An outbreak of Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection occurred in the summer of 1978 in a boys' camp in northern Wisconsin and affected 139 of 196 persons (71%); 115 (59%) had laboratory evidence of infection. In 77% of the cases, onset of disease occurred within three weeks after arrival at camp, in contrast to the usually indolent spread of the disease. Attack rates decreased with increasing age. The sensitivity of serology for detecting M pneumoniae disease may have been as low as 79%. There was shorter duration of cough in those treated with erythromycin within four days after onset of symptoms.Etiology and severity of community acquired pneumonia in children from Uruguay: a 4-year study.The 4-year study (1987-1990) covered the major clinical-epidemiological characteristics of pneumonia in children as diagnosed at the emergency service of the Children's Hospital, as well as etiologies, and factors involved in the most severe cases. Etiology was determined in 47.7% of the 541 pneumonia cases, involving 283 pathogens of which 38.6% were viruses and 12.6% bacteria. Viral and mixed etiologies were more frequent in children under 12 months of age. Bacteria predominated in ages between 6 and 23 months. Among the viruses, respiratory syncytial virus predominated (66%). The bacterial pneumonias accounted for 12.2% of the recognized etiologies. The most important bacterial agents were S. pneumoniae (64%) and H. influenzae (19%). H. influenzae and mixed infections had a relevant participation during the 1988 season, pointing to annual variations in the relative participation of pathogens and its possible implication in severity of diseases. Correlation of severity and increased percentage of etiological diagnosis was assessed: patients with respiratory rates over 70 rpm, or pleural effusion and/or extensive pulmonary parenchyma compromise yielded higher positive laboratory results. Various individual and family risk factors were recognized when comparing pneumonia children with healthy controls.Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection in children with acute respiratory infection.A prospective study was performed on 93 children admitted to Kasturba Medical College Hospital, Manipal and TMA Pai Rotary Hospital of Udupi and Karkala. Blood samples from 93 children admitted to the ward with no respiratory illness were taken as age-matched controls for the inpatients, IgM antibody against Mycoplasma pneumoniae was detected using a commercial kit (Virion-Serion ELISA, Germany) following the manufacturer's instructions. 23.96% of the inpatients with respiratory tract symptoms had IgM antibodies against Mycoplasma pneumoniae. The highest infection rate was found to be in the 2-5 and 5-10 year age group. The most common mode of presentation was an upper respiratory focus of infection with cervical lymphadenopathy. Bronchial breathing signifying pneumonic consolidation was significantly less in the Mycoplasma positive group (p = 0.006). There was no statistically significant difference in the radiological findings in the Mycoplasma positive and Mycoplasma negative groups.Acute lower respiratory tract infection due to Chlamydia and Mycoplasma spp. in Egyptian children under 5 years of age.Mixed community-acquired pneumonia in hospitalised patients.The role of mixed community-acquired pneumonia (CAP) is controversial. The aim of the present study was to determine the incidence, principal microbial patterns, clinical predictors and course of mixed CAP. The current study included 1,511 consecutive hospitalised patients with CAP. Of these, 610 (40%) patients had an established aetiology. One pathogen was demonstrated in 528 patients and 82 (13%) patients had mixed pneumonia. Cases including CAP, by a pyogenic bacteria and a complete paired serology for "atypicals", revealed that 82 (13%) patients had definite single pyogenic pneumonia and 28 patients (5%) had mixed pyogenic pneumonia. In patients with mixed CAP, Streptococcus pneumoniae was the most prevalent microorganism (44 out of 82; 54%). The most frequent combination was S. pneumoniae with Haemophilus influenzae (17 out of 82; 21%). Influenza virus A and S. pneumoniae (five out of 28; 18%) was the most frequent association in the mixed pyogenic pneumonia group. No clinical predictors for mixed pneumonias could be identified. Patients with mixed pyogenic pneumonia more frequently developed shock when compared with patients with single pyogenic pneumonia (18 versus 4%). In conclusion, mixed pneumonia occurs in >10% of cases with community-acquired pneumonia requiring hospitalisation.Rapid diagnosis of Mycoplasma pneumoniae by polymerase chain reaction in community-acquired lower respiratory tract infections.Two hundred children hospitalized for community-acquired lower respiratory tract infections (LRTIs) were investigated for Mycoplasma pneumoniae employing serological tests and a P1 adhesin gene-based polymerase chain reaction assay (PCR) on nasopharyngeal aspirates. Serological evidence of M. pneumoniae infection was observed in 68 (34%) patients and PCR was positive in 20 (10%) children. Together PCR and/or enzyme immuno assay detected M. pneumoniae in 71(35.5%) children. Our data underline the role of M. pneumoniae in Indian children with community-acquired LRTIs even in children aged < 24 months.Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydophila pneumoniae in children with community-acquired pneumonia in Thailand.The prevalence of community-acquired pneumonia (CAP) caused by atypical pathogens in Thai children is unknown.To examine the prevalence of Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydophila pneumoniae infections in paediatric patients (aged 2-15 years) with CAP in three academic hospitals using standardised laboratory techniques. The characteristics of atypical pneumonia were also compared with other causes of CAP.Diagnosis of current infection was based on a four-fold or more rise in antibody serum samples or persistently high antibody titres together with the presence of mycoplasmal or chlamydial DNA in secretions.Of 245 patients with CAP, 17.5% of cases were caused by atypical pathogens (M. pneumoniae 14.3%, C. pneumoniae 2.8% and co-infection 0.4%). We also found atypical pathogens in young children aged 2-5 years. The clinical and laboratory findings did not distinguish atypical pneumonia from other CAPs. Segmental or lobar consolidation on chest X-rays was more common in atypical pneumonia, while dyspnoea was more prominent in other CAPs.Our data show a high prevalence of M. pneumoniae and C. pneumoniae in Thai children with CAP, including in children aged 2-5 years.Atypical bacterial pathogens in community-acquired pneumonia in children: a hospital-based study.A total of 243 children aged one month to five years with World Health Organization defined severe community acquired pneumonia were studied for the presence of atypical bacterial pathogens: 24 were found positive for mycoplasma infection. There was no significant association with any of the clinical, laboratory and radiological variables in children with pneumonia by the atypical pathogen.Differentiation of bacterial and viral pneumonia in children.A study was undertaken to investigate the differential diagnostic role of chest radiographic findings, total white blood cell count (WBC), erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), and serum C reactive protein (CRP) in children with community acquired pneumonia of varying aetiology.The study population consisted of 254 consecutive children admitted to hospital with community acquired pneumonia diagnosed between 1993 and 1995. WBC, ESR, and CRP levels were determined on admission. Seventeen infective agents (10 viruses and seven bacteria) were searched for. Chest radiographs were retrospectively and separately reviewed by three paediatric radiologists.A potential causative agent was found in 215 (85%) of the 254 cases. Bacterial infection was found in 71% of 137 children with alveolar infiltrates on the chest radiograph, while 72% of the 134 cases with a bacterial pneumonia had alveolar infiltrates. Half of the 77 children with solely interstitial infiltrates on the chest radiograph had evidence of bacterial infection. The proportion of patients with increased WBC or ESR did not differ between bacterial and viral pneumonias, but differences in the CRP levels of >40 mg/l, >80 mg/l, and >120 mg/l were significant although the sensitivity for detecting bacterial pneumonia was too low for use in clinical practice.Most children with alveolar pneumonia, especially those with lobar infiltrates, have laboratory evidence of a bacterial infection. Interstitial infiltrates are seen in both viral and bacterial pneumonias.Community-acquired pneumonia in patients requiring hospitalization.This study aimed to investigate the microbial aetiology of community-acquired pneumonia (CAP) in patients requiring hospitalization.A prospective study of consecutive non-immunocompromised patients aged 12 years and above admitted with CAP from August 1997 to May 1999 was undertaken.Of 127 patients hospitalized for CAP, an aetiological diagnosis was achieved in 53 cases (41.7%). Klebsiella pneumoniae was the most frequently isolated pathogen and caused 10.2% of all the cases, followed by Streptococcus pneumoniae (5.5%), Haemophilus influenzae (5.5%), Mycoplasma pneumoniae (3.9%) and Pseudomonas aeruginosa (3.9%). Gram-negative bacilli were significantly more frequently identified in patients aged 60 years or older and in patients with comorbid illnesses. Twelve of 13 patients who died from CAP had other comorbid illnesses compared to 63 of 114 patients who survived (P = 0.014). Three of eight bacteraemic patients died compared with 10 of 119 non-bacteraemic patients (P = 0.035).The microbiology of CAP in patients requiring hospitalization in Malaysia appears to be different from that in Western countries. Gram-negative bacilli were more frequently isolated in older patients and in those with comorbidity. Mortality from CAP is more likely in patients with comorbidity and in those who are bacteraemic.An open, randomized, comparative study of clarithromycin and erythromycin in the treatment of children with community-acquired pneumonia.This study aimed to evaluate the efficacy and safety of clarithromycin and erythromycin in the treatment of community-acquired pneumonia in children.Children with community-acquired pneumonia were randomly assigned to receive 10-day regimens of either clarithromycin 15 mg/kg/day, twice a day, or erythromycin 30-50 mg/kg/day, four times daily.A total of 97 children entered this study, including 26 with Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection, 15 with Chlamydia pneumoniae infection, and 6 with mixed mycoplasma and chlamydia infections. Fifty and 47 children received clarithromycin and erythromycin treatment, respectively. Three children withdrew from the study because the identified pathogens were resistant to the study drugs. All 47 children with mycoplasma or chlamydia infection were cured clinically. Delayed defervescence, defined as a fever lasting for more than 72 h after treatment, was observed in 4 of 22 clarithromycin-treated children (18%) and in 3 of 15 erythromycin-treated children (20%) [p>0.05]. Gastrointestinal side effects, including vomiting, abdominal pain and diarrhea, were observed in 3 of 50 children (6%) receiving clarithromycin and in 11 of 49 children (22%) receiving erythromycin (p=0.039). Excluding children with abnormal pretreatment liver function, abnormal liver function after treatment was observed in only one child, treated with erythromycin. Post-treatment eosinophil and platelet counts were significantly elevated after treatment in both groups.Clarithromycin showed efficacy equivalent to erythromycin for the treatment of mycoplasma or chlamydia pneumonia in children. However, the tolerability of clarithromycin was superior to that of erythromycin.Pneumonia caused by Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydophila pneumoniae in children - comparative analysis of clinical picture.The aim of the study was comparative analysis of clinical picture and prevalence of pneumonia caused by Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydophila pneumoniae in children.The study involved 332 children hospitalized in the 3rd Department of Paediatric, Polish Mother's Memorial Hospital - Research Institute, due to pneumonia caused by Mycoplasma pneumoniae - group I or Chlamydophila pneumonia - group II.Over 2003-2009 period there were 1870 children hospitalized due to pneumonia, of which in 332 (17.8%) the Mycoplasma pneumoniae and/or Chlamydophila pneumoniae etiology was confirmed. Mycoplasma pneumoniae, Chlamydophila pneumoniae, and mixed infection was diagnosed in 198 (10.6%), 102 (5.5%), and 32 (1.7%) children, respectively. The dominant clinical feature in both groups was cough, observed in 186 (93.9%) and 88 (86.3%) children, respectively. Further, reddening of the throat, rhinitis, shortness of breath, fever, enlarged lymph nodes, skin lesions and dyspepsia were also observed. The frequency of specific clinical features in both groups was similar. Statistical relationship (p0.05) was observed only in case of skin lesions. In chest x-ray there was no statistical link as for analyzed changes. Interstitial inflammatory changes were most frequently observed.Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydophila pneumoniae are significant etiological factors in pneumonia in children, and as such they should be taken into consideration in differential diagnosis of pneumonia in children. The clinical picture of pneumonia caused by Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydophila pneumoniae is hardly specific, with basic labs and chest x-ray of little help in differentiation of infection etiology.Prospective study of the aetiology and outcome of pneumonia in the community.A prospective one-year study of community pneumonia was conducted in Nottingham. 236 of 251 episodes of pneumonia (defined as an acute lower respiratory tract infection, for which antibiotics were prescribed, associated with new focal signs on examination of the chest) were investigated. Acute radiographic changes were present in 93 (39%). A pathogen was identified in 129 (55%) episodes, with Streptococcus pneumoniae, Haemophilus influenzae, and influenza viruses those most frequently identified. Mycoplasma pneumoniae was uncommon and infection with Legionella pneumophila was found in only 1 episode. Hospital admission was required in 52 (22%) episodes. 7 patients died (3%), all but one of the deaths occurring in patients who had been admitted to hospital. Pneumonia in the community is common but few people die of it. Initial antibiotic therapy should always cover S pneumoniae and H influenzae.Community-acquired pneumonia of mixed etiology: prevalence, clinical characteristics, and outcome.Community-acquired pneumonia (CAP) of mixed etiology has increasingly been appreciated in the literature, but its clinical significance remains unknown. The aim of this analysis was to describe the prevalence, clinical characteristics, and outcome of CAP of mixed etiology. Data were obtained from a 2-year prospective study of consecutive patients with CAP in whom an extensive microbiological workup was performed. Predefined strict criteria were used to establish the etiology. A total of 493 patients were included. A single pathogen was detected in 222 (45%) cases and two or more pathogens in 28 (5.7%) cases. Mixed infections were seen across all age groups and in patients treated both in hospital and as outpatients. The most frequent combinations of pathogens were those of a bacterium plus an "atypical" organism (28.6%) and of two bacterial organisms (28.6%). Compared with patients with monomicrobial pneumonia, patients with mixed pneumonia were more likely to have underlying conditions (64% vs. 45%, p=0.04) and dementia (25% vs. 10%, p=0.02). The incidence of a defined series of complications was higher in patients with mixed pneumonia (39.3% vs. 18.6%; OR=2.84; p=0.02). Community-acquired pneumonia of mixed etiology is uncommon. Patients with mixed pneumonia are more likely to have underlying medical conditions, and they may have a more severe course of disease.Multipathogen infections in hospitalized children with acute respiratory infections.To explore the epidemiologic and clinical features of, and interactions among, multipathogen infections in hospitalized children with acute respiratory tract infection (ARTI). A prospective study of children admitted with ARTI was conducted. Peripheral blood samples were analyzed by indirect immunofluorescence to detect respiratory agents including respiratory syncytial virus; adenovirus; influenza virus (Flu) types A and B; parainfluenza virus (PIV) types 1, 2, and 3; chlamydia pneumonia; and mycoplasma pneumonia. A medical history of each child was taken.Respiratory agents were detected in 164 (51.9%) of 316 children with ARTI. A single agent was identified in 50 (15.8%) children, and multiple agents in 114 (36.1%). Flu A was the most frequently detected agent, followed by Flu B. Coinfection occurred predominantly in August and was more frequent in children between 3 and 6 years of age. A significantly higher proportion of Flu A, Flu B, and PIV 1 was detected in samples with two or more pathogens per sample than in samples with a single pathogen.Our study suggests that there is a high occurrence of multipathogen infections in children admitted with ARTI and that coinfection is associated with certain pathogens.Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Legionella pneumophila in community-acquired lower respiratory tract infections among hospitalized children: diagnosis by real time PCR.Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Legionella pneumophila are increasingly recognized as important agents of community-acquired lower respiratory tract infections (LRTI). Mycoplasma pneumoniae has been also recognized as a cause of nosocomial infections. The aim of this study was to investigate the role of real time polymerase chain reaction (PCR) for the rapid diagnosis of these infections among hospitalized children with community-acquired LRTI. During 2001, 65 children were prospectively studied. Microbiological investigation consisted of capillary PCR with a LightCycler for M. pneumoniae and L. pneumophila in induced sputum or throat swab specimens, IgM enzyme immunoassay for M. pneumoniae and immunofluorescence for L. pneumophila in paired sera. Serology testing showed acute M. pneumoniae infection in 18 (27.5%) patients and L. pneumophila in 1 (1.5%). M. pneumoniae was also detected in sputum specimen by capillary PCR in 9 (50%) serologically diagnosed cases, including 4 (22%) with non-diagnostic IgM levels in the acute phase. Capillary PCR and IgM enzyme immunoassay diagnosed together 15 (83%) M. pneumoniae cases in the acute phase. It is concluded that M. pneumoniae is an important cause of LRTI necessitating hospitalization among children in Greece. Capillary PCR in sputum may diagnose M. pneumoniae LRTI in the acute setting and direct therapy and isolation of patients.Role of Chlamydia pneumoniae and Mycoplasma pneumoniae as causative agents of community-acquired pneumonia in hospitalised children and adolescents.The aim of the study presented here was to determine the prevalence of Chlamydia pneumoniae versus Mycoplasma pneumoniae infections in paediatric patients with community-acquired pneumonia. A total of 50 patients (mean age, 5.5 years; median, 3.9 years) with community-acquired pneumonia were enrolled. Four patients were found to have Chlamydia pneumoniae infection (1 culture positive, 1 PCR positive and 2 serology positive) and 16 patients had Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection (2 PCR positive, 4 PCR and serology positive, 10 serology positive), including three patients with coinfection. The rates of Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection were 22%, 35% and 40% in children aged 1-3, >3-7 and >7 years, respectively. Acute Chlamydia pneumoniae infection was substantially less common than Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection in our study cohort.Etiology of community-acquired pneumonia in 254 hospitalized children.Childhood community-acquired pneumonia is a common illness, but there have been relatively few comprehensive studies of the viral and bacterial etiology in developed countries. The aim of the present investigation was to determine the etiology of community-acquired pneumonia in hospitalized children by several laboratory methods.In a 3-year prospective study a nasopharyngeal aspirate for viral studies and acute and convalescent serum samples for viral and bacterial serology were taken from 254 children with symptoms of acute infection and infiltrates compatible with pneumonia in the chest radiograph. The role of 17 microbes was investigated.A potential causative agent was detected in 215 (85%) of the 254 patients. Sixty-two percent of the patients had viral infection, 53% had bacterial infection and 30% had evidence of concomitant viral-bacterial infection. Streptococcus pneumoniae (37%), respiratory syncytial virus (29%) and rhinovirus (24%) were the most common agents associated with community-acquired pneumonia. Only one patient had a positive blood culture (S. pneumoniae) of 125 cultured. A dual viral infection was detected in 35 patients, and a dual bacterial infection was detected in 19 patients.The possible causative agent of childhood community-acquired pneumonia can be detected in most cases. Further studies are warranted to determine what etiologic investigations would aid in the management of pneumonia. With effective immunization for S. pneumoniae and respiratory syncytial virus infections, more than one-half of the pneumonia cases in this study could have been prevented.Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection in Yemen: incidence, presentation and antibiotic susceptibility.To determine the incidence, clinical presentation and antibiotic susceptibility of Mycoplasma pneumoniae at the main hospitals in Sana'a, we studied 405 patients clinically and radiographically diagnosed with lower respiratory tract infections aged 10-60 years. M. pneumoniae was identified by 3 different methods: culture, antigen detection and IgM serology. Antibiotic susceptibility testing was performed for confirmed isolates by macro-broth dilution technique. There were 125 patients (30.9%) with current infection, mostly among younger age groups, with bronchopneumonia the most common underlying clinical condition. All tested isolates were susceptible to all antibiotics in the in vitro antibiogram, with erythromycin the most active. The results indicate the need for different approaches in the diagnosis of M. pneumoniae infection in Yemen.[Prospective study of 221 community acquired pneumonias followed up in an outpatient clinic. Etiology and clinical-radiological progression].All the community acquired pneumonia followed up in an outpatient clinic were prospectively studied in order to determine: etiology, clinical-radiological characteristics and its progression with diagnostic and therapeutic protocols.We arranged clinical evaluation protocols, etiological diagnosis by means of serology (in the first visit and three weeks later); and when necessary, by means of fiberbronchoscopy (protected microbiological brush), as well as clinical and radiological progression (up to three visits) after empirical treatment.Initially, 240 patients were included, of which 221 were fully followed up. Etiological diagnosis was obtained in 86 patients (39%). The bacteria most frequently isolated was Coxiella burnetii (12.2%), followed up Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Legionella pneumophila. Two cases of Strepcococus pneumoniae were diagnosed. The most frequent radiological onset was alveolar infiltrate (86%). The initial empiric treatment were macrolids (71%) or second generation cephalosporines (22%). Most patients presented a favourable clinical and radiological progression. Only 2 patients needed admission to the hospital (< 1%).In community acquired pneumonias studied in our outpatient clinic we found a high number of "atypical" agents. Treatment with macrolids or second generation cephalosporines are appropriate for these patients.Acute respiratory tract infections in Indian children with special reference to Mycoplasma pneumoniae.A total of 70 Indian children of either sex and under 5 years of age who were admitted to the All India Institute of Medical Sciences, New Delhi during a 1-year period (January 1994-December 1994) with complaints suggestive of acute respiratory tract infections (ARTI), were investigated for bacterial aetiology of infection with special reference to Mycoplasma pneumoniae. Microbial aetiology could be established in 44/70 (62.8 per cent) of cases of ARTI. Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection was seen in 21/70 (30 per cent), aerobic bacteria in 14/70 (20 per cent), Chlamydia pneumoniae in 2/70 (2.8 per cent), and mixed infection with mycoplasma either with bacteria and/or chlamydia in 7/70 (10 per cent). However, in 26/70 (37.1 per cent) cases no cause could be detected. Diagnosis of infection with M.pneumoniae was based on culture in 2/20 (10 per cent) cases, antigen detection in throat swab by indirect immunofluorescence assay using specific antibody in 16/70 (22.8 per cent) cases, and demonstration of IgM antibody in serum by serodia Myco II particle agglutination test in 17/70 (24.2 per cent). Streptococcus pneumoniae (9/70, 12.8 per cent) and Staphylococcus aureus (5/70, 7.1 per cent) were the aerobic isolates from blood in these patients. Results of this study indicate that M.pneumoniae plays a significant role in respiratory tract infection in an Indian paediatric population. Rapid diagnostic procedures, such as antigen detection and IgM antibody demonstration, should be used more widely to determine the infective aetiology early in the course of illness. The study also highlights the mixed aetiology in ARTI in children, which has important therapeutic implications.Prevalence and clinical presentations of atypical pathogens infection in community acquired pneumonia in Thailand.To determine the prevalence of atypical pneumonia and clinical presentations in patients with community acquired pneumonia (CAP).A prospective multi-centered study was performed in patients aged > or = 2 years with the diagnosis of CAP who were treated at seven governmental hospitals in Bangkok from December 2001 to November 2002. The diagnosis of current infection was based on > or = 4 fold rise in antibody sera or persistently high antibody titers together with the presence of DNA of M. pneumoniae or C. pneumoniae in respiratory secretion or antigen of L. pneumophila in the urine. Clinical presentations were compared between patients with atypical pneumonia and unspecified pneumonia.Of 292 patients, 18.8% had current infection with atypical respiratory pathogens (M. pneumoniae 14.0%, C. pneumoniae 3.4%, L. pneumophila 0.4% and mixed infection 1.0%). Only age at presentation was significantly associated with atypical pneumonia in adults, while absence of dyspnea, lobar consolidation, and age > or = 5 years were significant findings for atypical pneumonia in children.The present study confirms the significance of atypical pathogens in adults and children. Moreover lobar consolidation is likely to predict atypical pneumonia in childhood CAP.[Contribution to the problem of sporadic acute respiratory infections (ARI) caused by RS viruses and Mycoplasma pneumoniae in preschool-age children and adults].[Clinical and epidemiological spectrum of Mycoplasma pneumoniae infections at a pediatric hospital].The objective of this study was to determine the epidemiology of Mycoplasma pneumoniae infections at our hospital and to evaluate the prescription of macrolides to empirically treat respiratory infections in children.A one year prospective study was performed. To find out the prevalence of M. pneumoniae infections, we obtained blood samples of 519 children attending our hospital out-patient department to determine M. pneumoniae IgG levels. In order to establish the incidence, IgM antibodies against M. pneumoniae were measured in 255 children admitted to the hospital showing clinical pictures compatible with this infection.In the first years of life, prevalence of M. pneumoniae infection was low. According to our study, only 3.3% of 1 year-old patients had M. pneumoniae antibodies. Antibody levels increased in children of 5 years or older. The highest rates, between 58.5% and 63.3%, were detected in patients between 8 and 12 years of age. The incidence rate (6.7%) was low among the children admitted. The most frequent clinical entity was pneumonia (82%). The highest rate of infection was found in children of 8 to 10 years. Symtomatology was mainly sub-acute. Crioagglutinins provided the most significant predictive value for etiological diagnosis.M. pneumoniae infections gain significance in patients over 5 years of age. In our environment, incidence of acute symptomatic infection is low. We consider that both age and presentation of acute respiratory processes should be taken into account when establishing empirical macrolide treatment in children.Chlamydia and Mycoplasma serology in respiratory tract infections of children.One of the challenges in planning the treatment of respiratory tract infection in children is identifying the causative agent. The objective of the present study was to investigate the incidence of Mycoplasma and Chlamydia in the etiology of respiratory tract infections of children. The present study included 100 children, three months to 12 years of age, admitted to the outpatient department of pediatrics with such respiratory symptoms as fever, cough and respiratory distress. Following a detailed clinical history and physical examination, complete blood count, erythrocyte sedimentation rate, peripheral blood smear and chest X-ray were obtained from each patient. At admission, IgG and IgM for Mycoplasma pneumoniae, Chlamydia pneumoniae, Chlamydia trachomatis and Chlamydia psittaci were determined serologically. Positive antibody titer was found for Chlamydia and Mycoplasma in 18 (18%) of the patients. It was found that 2% of the patients had acute C. pneumoniae infection. When the subjects who had infections in the past or had re-infection were also considered; 6% were infected with C. pneumoniae, 3% with C. trachomatis, 1% with C. psittaci and 8% with M. pneumoniae. The presence of eosinophilia (> or = 4%) or the presence of siblings in the house were considered as factors favoring Chlamydial infections. High antibody titers for M. pneumoniae and C. pneumoniae were found more frequently after the age of two. Patients older than two years should be evaluated carefully for antibiotic treatments against atypical agents in pediatric lower respiratory tract infections.Epidemiology and clinical features of Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection in children.Mycoplasma pneumoniae (MP) is, considered to affect rarely children less than 5 yrs of age. This study was performed to describe the epidemiology and the clinical features of MP lower respiratory tract infection (LRTI) in children, presenting to a tertiary children hospital. Eleven month-longitudinal study of LRTI due to MP, diagnosed by polymerase chain reaction (PCR) on throat swab specimen, was performed. Out of 866 children with LRTI admitted to the Gaslini Pediatric Institute in Genoa, 102 had a positive PCR for MP. We found 39 preschool-aged children, 42 school-aged children and 21 young adolescent [6.20 (3.81) yrs old]. Interestingly, eight MP+ infants had <8 months of age. The commonest presentations were cough and/or fever (76.5%). Tachypnoea, upper respiratory tract involvement, diarrhoea and vomiting were more common in the <5 yr Gr as compared to the other groups. Chest X-ray was found abnormal in 76 children: consolidations were the commonest finding. Laboratory test showed that the preschool-aged children had a higher number of lymphocytes (p<0.0001) and monocytes (p=0.009). Thrombocytosis was found in 35.7% of children and was more frequent in the preschool-aged children (p=0.013). MP infection is common in preschool-aged children, including young infants, and may have different clinical presentation, as compared to older children.Use of simple heuristics to target macrolide prescription in children with community-acquired pneumonia.Macrolides are the first-line antibiotic treatment of community-acquired pneumonia (CAP). Owing to alarming resistance rates among invasive Streptococcus pneumoniae isolates, particularly in young children, macrolide use should be restricted to patients infected with susceptible pathogens, eg, Mycoplasma pneumoniae.To develop a simple clinical prediction rule for identifying M pneumoniae as the cause of CAP in children.Prospective cohort study in 253 children with radiologically confirmed CAP in a walk-in clinic of a tertiary care hospital.Mycoplasma infection, proven by results of antibody testing of paired serum samples (gold standard). We compared the area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (c statistic) of the following 2 prediction models: a scoring system derived from logistic regression analysis and a fast-and-frugal decision tree.Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection was confirmed in 32 (13%) of 253 children. A scoring system based on duration of fever and patient age yielded a c statistic of 0.84 (95% confidence interval [CI], 0.77-0.91), compared with that of the decision tree (c = 0.76 [95% CI, 0.70-0.83]). The scoring system identified 75% of all cases as being at high or very high risk for M pneumoniae infection; the decision tree, 72% at high risk. The scoring system would curtail macrolide prescriptions by 75%; the decision tree, by 68%.In children with CAP, simple clinical decision rules identify patients at risk for M pneumoniae infection. At present US macrolide resistance rates among invasive S pneumoniae isolates, both rules increase the chance of prescribing effective first-line antibiotics compared with general macrolide administration.Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydia pneumoniae in pediatric community-acquired pneumonia: comparative efficacy and safety of clarithromycin vs. erythromycin ethylsuccinate.We evaluated 260 previously healthy children ages 3 through 12 years who had clinical signs and symptoms of pneumonia, radiographically confirmed. Patients were randomized 1:1 to a 10-day course of either clarithromycin suspension 15 mg/kg/day divided twice a day or erythromycin suspension 40 mg/kg/day divided twice a day or three times a day. Evidence of infection with Chlamydia pneumoniae was detected in 28% (74) of patients: 13% (34) by nasopharyngeal culture and 18% (48) by serology with the microimmunofluorescence assay. Evidence of infection with Mycoplasma pneumoniae was detected in 27% (69) of patients: 20% (53) by nasopharyngeal culture or polymerase chain reaction and 17% (44) by serology with the use of enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay. Serologic confirmation of infection was observed in 23% (8) and 53% (28) of patients with bacteriologically detected C. pneumoniae and M. pneumoniae, respectively. Treatment with clarithromycin vs. erythromycin, respectively, yielded the following outcomes: clinical success 98% (121 of 124) vs. 95% (105 of 110); radiologic success 98% (109 of 111) vs. 94% (92 of 110); and eradication by pathogen, C. pneumoniae 79% (15 of 19) vs. 86% (12 of 14) and M. pneumoniae 100% (9 of 9) vs. 100% (4 of 4). Adverse events were primarily gastrointestinal occurring in almost one-fourth of patients in both groups, and were mild to moderate in severity. Clarithromycin and erythromycin were similarly effective and safe for the treatment of radiographically proved, community-acquired pneumonia in children older than 2 years old.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)An Asian study on the prevalence of atypical respiratory pathogens in community-acquired pneumonia.In many parts of Asia, the inaccessibility and high cost of diagnostic tests have hampered the study of community-acquired pneumonia (CAP) caused by atypical respiratory pathogens.This surveillance study examined the frequency of infection with Mycoplasma pneumoniae, Chlamydophila pneumoniae, and Legionella pneumophila in 1756 patients presenting with signs and symptoms of CAP at 12 medical centres in Asia, using standardised laboratory techniques and interpretation criteria in all participating centres.Diagnosis of current infection was based on significant changes in antibody titer or persisting high antibody titers, together with the presence of bacterial DNA in respiratory secretions, in the case of M. pneumoniae and C. pneumoniae infections, or bacterial antigen in urine, in the case of L. pneumophila serogroup 1 infection.Using these criteria, results from 1374 patients with paired sera showed that, overall, 23.5% of CAP cases were associated with infection with atypical respiratory pathogens, with M. pneumoniae, C. pneumoniae, and L. pneumophila being found in 12.2%, 4.7%, and 6.6% of cases, respectively. Persisting high antibody titers indicative of past exposure to M. pneumoniae, C. pneumoniae, and L. pneumophila were seen in 10.2%, 4.8%, and 18.9% of patients, respectively.These data reflect the overall high prevalence of these atypical pathogens among Asian patients with CAP.Clinical characterisation of pneumonia caused by atypical pathogens combining classic and novel predictors.The aim of this study was to characterise community-acquired pneumonia (CAP) caused by atypical pathogens by combining distinctive clinical and epidemiological features and novel biological markers. A population-based prospective study of consecutive patients with CAP included investigation of biomarkers of bacterial infection, e.g., procalcitonin, C-reactive protein and lipopolysaccharide-binding protein (LBP) levels. Clinical, radiological and laboratory data for patients with CAP caused by atypical pathogens were compared by univariate and multivariate analysis with data for patients with typical pathogens and patients from whom no organisms were identified. Two predictive scoring models were developed with the most discriminatory variables from multivariate analysis. Of 493 patients, 94 had CAP caused by atypical pathogens. According to multivariate analysis, patients with atypical pneumonia were more likely to have normal white blood cell counts, have repetitive air-conditioning exposure, be aged <65 years, have elevated aspartate aminotransferase levels, have been exposed to birds, and have lower serum levels of LBP. Two different scoring systems were developed that predicted atypical pathogens with sensitivities of 35.2% and 48.8%, and specificities of 93% and 91%, respectively. The combination of selected patient characteristics and laboratory data identified up to half of the cases of atypical pneumonia with high specificity, which should help clinicians to optimise initial empirical therapy for CAP.Seroetiology of acute lower respiratory infections among hospitalized children in Beijing.Little is known of the etiology of childhood acute lower respiratory infections in China, where the use of antimicrobials is indiscriminate. Trials to change such a policy require etiologic data, especially on the bacteria most relevant to these common diseases.One hundred consecutive infants and children from 3 months to 14 years of age with symptoms and signs compatible with acute lower respiratory infections were studied prospectively in the largest pediatric hospital in Beijing from February to May, 1997. Blood culture, thorax radiography and paired sera for 20 microbiologic assays were taken, and the course of illness was monitored uniformly. Disease severity was graded.In 24 cases there was evidence only of bacterial etiology, and in 5 solely viral agents were found; 3 children probably had a mixed bacterial-viral infection. Surprisingly no pneumococcal infection was detected, Mycoplasma pneumoniae (n = 21), Haemophilus influenzae type b (n = 8) and Chlamydia pneumoniae (n = 7) being the dominant bacteria. All children recovered.Routine use of antimicrobials for these patients seems unjustified. Serologic evidence for the H. influenzae type b etiology is encouraging in terms of vaccination, but confirmatory studies are needed.Mycoplasma Pneumoniae infection in Malaysian children admitted with community acquired pneumonia.Mycoplasma pneumoniae is increasingly recognized as an important cause of community acquired pneumonia (CAP) in children. We determined the importance of M. pneumoniae as a causative agent in 170 children aged 1 month to 15 years who were hospitalized with CAP over a 6-month period. The diagnosis of M. pneumoniae infection was based on serological evidence obtained by a particle agglutination test (SERODIA-MYCO II). A positive serological diagnosis was made if the acute phase serum titer was more than 1:160 or paired samples taken 2-4 weeks apart showed a four-fold or greater rise in the serum titer. M. pneumoniae was identified as the causative agent in 40 (23.5%) children. Children with M. pneumoniae infection were more likely to be older than 3 years (OR 4.0 95%CI 1.8-9.1, p<0.001), Chinese (OR 4.3 95%CI 2.0-8.9, p<0.001), have a duration of illness longer than 7 days prior to admission (OR 6.0 95%CI 2.7-13.5, p<0.001) and have perihilar interstitial changes on chest X-ray (OR 4.6 95%CI 2.2-9.9, p<0.001). A significant number of hospital admissions for CAP in Malaysian children can be attributed to M. pneumoniae. It is important to identify these children so as to administer the most appropriate antibiotic treatment.Safety and efficacy of azithromycin in the treatment of community-acquired pneumonia in children.To compare the safety and efficacy of azithromycin with amoxicillin/clavulanate or erythromycin for the treatment of community-acquired pneumonia, including atypical pneumonia caused by Mycoplasma pneumoniae and Chlamydia pneumoniae.Multicenter, parallel group, double blind trial in which patients 6 months to 16 years of age with community-acquired pneumonia were randomized 2:1 to receive either azithromycin for 5 days or conventional therapy for 10 days (amoxicillin/clavulanate if < or =5 years of age or erythromycin estolate if >5 years of age). Patients from 23 geographically diverse sites were evaluated for clinical outcomes and/or adverse events at Days 3 to 5, Days 15 to 19 and 4 to 6 weeks posttherapy. Microbiology (culture or polymerase chain reaction) was done at baseline and Days 15 to 19 for bacteria, Chlamydia pneumoniae and Mycoplasma pneumoniae. Serology for C. pneumoniae and M. pneumoniae was done at baseline and 4 to 6 weeks posttherapy.Of 456 patients enrolled during 17 consecutive months, 420 were evaluable. Clinical success at Study Days 15 to 19 was 94.6% in the azithromycin group and 96.2% in the comparative treatment group (P = 0.735) and at 4 to 6 weeks posttherapy 90.6 and 87.1%, respectively (P = 0.330). Evidence of infection was identified in 46% of 420 evaluable patients (1.9% bacteria, 29.5% M. pneumoniae and 15% C. pneumoniae). Microbiologic eradication was 81% for C. pneumoniae and 100% for M. pneumoniae in the azithromycin group vs. 100 and 57%, respectively, in the comparator group. Treatment-related adverse events occurred in 11.3% of the azithromycin group and 31% in the comparator group (P < 0.05).Azithromycin used once daily for 5 days produced a satisfactory therapeutic outcome similar to those of amoxicillin/clavulanate or erythromycin given three times a day for 10 days for treatment of community-acquired pneumonia. Azithromycin had significantly fewer side effects than comparator drugs.Etiology and response to antibiotic therapy of community-acquired pneumonia in French children.The aim of this study was to determine the etiologic agents associated with community-acquired pneumonia in 104 French children ages 18 months to 13 years. Potential respiratory pathogens were identified in 87 (85%) cases; these included respiratory syncytial virus in ten, other viruses in 20, Streptococcus pneumoniae in 14 and Mycoplasma pneumoniae (diagnosed by serologic procedures) in 43. Of 32 patients with Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection who were initially treated with beta-lactam antibiotics, 30 failed treatment. Recovery from mycoplasma infection occurred rapidly in patients treated with macrolide antibiotics (which included spiramycin in 31 patients, josamycin in 7, and erythromycin in 3); however, cough persisted in 12 patients for one month. The high frequency of Mycoplasma pneumoniae in children over 18 months of age must be considered when selecting an antibiotic for initial therapy.[Chlamydia pneumoniae infection and Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection in pediatric patients].We evaluated a total of 1104 pediatric patients with acute lower respiratory tract infection for C. pneumoniae infection and M. pneumoniae infection by serology during July 1995 to December 1998. A microimmunofluorescence test was used for diagnosis of C. pneumoniae infection and a high density particle agglutination test for that of M. pneumoniae infection. Acute C. pneumoniae infection was found in 149 patients (13.5%), acute M. pneumoniae infection in 118 patients (10.7%), and dual infection in 27 patients (2.4%). Among 305 patients with pneumonia, M. pneumoniae infection (83 patients, 27.2%) was more common than C. pneumoniae infection (47 patients, 15.4%). However among 799 patients with bronchitis. C. pneumoniae infection (102 patients, 12.8%) was more common than M. pneumoniae infection (35 patients, 4.4%). Patients with C. pneumoniae infection were more younger and more frequently wheezing than patients with M. pneumoniae infection. These findings demonstrate that C. pneumoniae infection in very common pathogen of pediatric lower respiratory tract infection as M. pneumoniae infection in Japan.Aetiology and resistance patterns of community-acquired pneumonia in Len, Nicaragua.We conducted a prevalence study to gain greater insight into the aetiology, bacterial resistance and risk factors for community-acquired pneumonia (CAP) in the region of Len, Nicaragua. During the period from July 2002 to January 2005, all consecutive patients with signs and symptoms suggestive of CAP were included in the study. Sputum samples, paired serum samples and urinary samples were collected for the detection of respiratory pathogens. The most frequently identified pathogens were Streptococcus pneumoniae (17%), followed by Staphylococcus aureus (5%), Chlamydia pneumoniae (5%) and Mycoplasma pneumoniae (4%). Pseudomonas aeruginosa was cultured from 5% of patients. No pathogens were identified in 55%. All tested S. pneumoniae were sensitive to erythromycin and penicillin. In contrast, resistance of S. aureus to penicillin and erythromycin was high.Mycoplasma pneumoniae infections in a rural setting in Canada.Mycoplasma pneumoniae infection was monitored in patients with symptoms of acute respiratory tract infection in a village in southeastern Ontario from April 1983 to April 1984. M. pneumoniae was isolated from 51 (48%) of the 106 patients. The incidence began to increase in May 1983, reached a peak in July and declined to normal by mid-August. During the epidemic period M. pneumoniae was detected in 36 of the 43 symptomatic patients. The most prominent features of the outbreak were the considerable intrafamilial attack rate and the high frequency of pneumonia among infected patients. Treatment with tetracyclines and erythromycin reduced the duration of the illness and accelerated the resolution of symptoms.